Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 3, chapter 377, Oregon Laws 2023,  for the biennium ending
June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from federal funds collected
or received by the Department of Corrections, is increased  by $1,729,649, for the expenditure
of federal grant awards.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 11, chapter 449, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium ending
June 30,  2025, as the maximum limit for payments of grants-in-aid, program costs and pur-
chased services by the  Department of Education from the Early Learning Account estab-
lished under  ORS 327.269, for early intervention services and early childhood special
education programs, is increased by  $22,107,626, for caseload growth in the Early
Intervention/Early Childhood Special Education program.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 25, chapter 534, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium ending
June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payments of grants-in-aid, program costs and  pur-
chased services by the Department of  Education from the Statewide Education Initiatives
Account established under ORS  327.250, for Early Literacy Success Community Grants, is
increased by $9,999,999, for implementation of the Early Literacy  Success Community and
Tribal Grant programs.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 12, chapter 449, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium ending
June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses by the Department  of Educa-
tion for a transfer of corporate activities tax funds from the Early Learning Account estab-
lished under ORS 327.269, to the  Department of Early Learning and Care, is increased by
$9,432,407.
SECTION 5.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 22, chapter 534, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium ending
June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses for operations, grants-in-aid,
program costs  and purchased services by the Department of Early Learning and Care from
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 1
corporate activity tax funds transferred  from the Early Learning Account by the Depart-
ment of Education, for  Birth Through Five Literacy Plan grants, is increased by $9,432,407,
for implementation of the Birth Through Five Literacy Plan.
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 8 (1), chapter 454, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds and funds described in sections 12 to 16, chapter 454, Oregon  Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for programs and related grants,
is increased by $5,000,000, for the Oregon Teacher Scholars Program.
SECTION 7.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 8 (1), chapter 454, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds and funds described in  sections 12 to 16, chapter 454, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for programs and related grants,
is increased by $1,100,000, for Educator Equity Plan Grants.
SECTION 8.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 2, chapter 484, Oregon Laws 2023,  for the biennium ending
June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees,  moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,
collected or  received by the Teacher Standards and Practices Commission for general oper-
ations, is increased by $914,270, for a backlog of investigations and applications for licensure.
SECTION 9.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount estab-
lished by section 5 (4), chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June 30,  2025,
as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,  excluding federal funds
described in section 2, chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or  received by the Oregon
Health Authority, for public health, is increased by  $9,940,000, for the implementation of a
federal grant from the United States Environmental  Protection Agency to fund water
infrastructure projects addressing public health risks related to emerging contaminants.
SECTION 10. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1  (7), chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for state assessments and enterprise-wide costs,  is in-
creased by $181,398, for staffing support  for the Department of Human Services, Office of
Financial Services.
SECTION 11. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the  amount estab-
lished by section 2 (9), chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June 30,  2025,
as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or  other revenues, in-
cluding Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax receipts, marijuana tax  receipts, beer and wine
tax receipts, provider taxes and Medicare receipts, but excluding lottery  funds and federal
funds not described in section 2, chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023,  collected or received by the
Oregon Health Authority,  for state assessments and enterprise-wide costs, is increased by
$25,574, for staffing support for the  Department of Human Services, Office of Financial Ser-
vices.
SECTION 12. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the  amount estab-
lished by section 5 (7), chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June 30,  2025,
as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,  excluding federal funds
described in section 2, chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or  received by the Oregon
Health Authority, for state assessments and enterprise-wide costs,  is increased by $43,846,
for staffing support for the Department of Human Services, Office of Financial Services.
SECTION 13. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health Authority by section  1 (2), chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, for
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 2
the biennium ending  June 30, 2025, for Health Systems Division programs, is increased by
$678,999, for compensation changes for workers who are not state employees.
SECTION 14. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount estab-
lished by section 5 (2), chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June 30,  2025,
as the maximum limit  for payment of expenses from federal funds, excluding federal funds
described in section 2, chapter  591, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by the Oregon
Health Authority, for Health Systems  Division programs, is increased by $968,137, for com-
pensation changes for workers who are not state employees.
SECTION 15. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Human Services by section 1  (6), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for aging and people with disabilities programs, is in-
creased by $39,124,068, for compensation changes for workers who are not state employees.
SECTION 16.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount estab-
lished by section 3 (6), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June 30,  2025,
as the maximum limit  for payment of expenses from federal funds, excluding federal funds
described in section 2, chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by  the Depart-
ment of Human Services, for aging and people with disabilities programs, is  increased by
$65,571,104, for compensation changes for workers who are not state employees.
SECTION 17. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Human Services by section 1  (7), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2025,  for intellectual/developmental disabilities programs,
is increased by $35,196,933, for compensation changes  for workers who are not state em-
ployees.
SECTION 18. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount estab-
lished by section 3 (7), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June 30,  2025,
as the maximum limit  for payment of expenses from federal funds, excluding federal funds
described in section 2, chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by  the Depart-
ment of  Human Services, for intellectual/developmental disabilities programs, is increased
by $65,652,349, for compensation changes for workers who are not state employees.
SECTION 19. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Human Services by section 1  (2), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for state assessments and enterprise-wide  costs, is
increased by $294,877, for staff for the Department of Human Services, Office of Financial
Services.
SECTION 20. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (2), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery,  Social Security Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section 2, chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by  the Depart-
ment of Human Services, for state assessments and enterprise-wide costs, is increased by
$702,814, for staff for the Department of Human Services, Office of Financial Services.
SECTION 21.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount estab-
lished by section 3 (2), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June 30,  2025,
as the maximum limit  for payment of expenses from federal funds, excluding federal funds
described in section 2, chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by  the Depart-
ment of Human Services, for state assessments and enterprise-wide costs, is increased by
$172,531, for staff for the Department of Human Services, Office of Financial Services.
SECTION 22.
In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of Justice, for the biennium ending June  30, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $1,000,000, for the payment of expenses  of district attorneys for
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 3
victim assistance, investigation and temporary  staffing and other one-time, nonroutine
prosecution expenses related to nonunanimous jury convictions.
SECTION 23. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Justice by section 1 (3), chapter 382, Oregon Laws 2023, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2025, for the  Criminal Justice Division, is increased by $2,670,217,
for the expansion of the Internet Crimes Against Children program.
SECTION 24.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (5), chapter 382, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or  received by the Department of Justice, for the Criminal Justice Division,
is increased by $396,936, for a Traffic Safety Resource  Prosecutor in the Driving Under the
Influence of Intoxicants program.
SECTION 25. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3 (2), chapter 357, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds
collected or received by the Oregon Department of Emergency  Management, for
Preparedness and Response, is increased by $2,988,286, for the  distribution of cybersecurity
and infrastructure security grants.
SECTION 26. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of the  State Fire Marshal by section 1, chapter 224, Oregon Laws
2023, for the biennium ending June  30, 2025, is increased by $8,536,728, for 2023 fire season
Emergency Conflagration Act costs.
SECTION 27. In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the  Public Defense Services Commission, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025,
out of the General Fund, the amount  of $5,719,295, for Court Mandated Expenses, for the
Temporary Hourly Increase Program.
SECTION 28. In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Public Defense Services Commission, for the biennium ending June  30, 2025,
out of the General Fund, the amount  of $2,132,498, for Preauthorized Expenses, for the
Temporary Hourly Increase Program.
SECTION 29. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Public Defense Services Commission by section 1 (1), chapter 481,  Oregon Laws
2023, for the biennium  ending June 30, 2025, for the Executive Division, is increased by
$135,978, for transfer of the agency from the  judicial to the executive branch of government.
SECTION 30. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Public Defense Services Commission by section 1 (9), chapter 481,  Oregon Laws
2023, for the biennium ending  June 30, 2025, for the Administrative Services Division, is in-
creased by $1,102,832,  for transfer of the agency from the judicial to the executive branch
of government.
SECTION 31. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 9 (2), chapter 475, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds
collected or received by the Oregon Business Development Department, for business, inno-
vation and trade, is increased by $29,167,717, for small business assistance and related ad-
ministrative expenses.
SECTION 32.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Business Development  Department by section 1 (1), chapter 475, Oregon
Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for arts, is decreased by $49,194, for a
budget realignment.
SECTION 33.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 4 (4), chapter 475, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 4
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the Oregon Business Development Department, for arts, is
increased by $687,822, for administrative and programmatic expenses of the Trust  for Cul-
tural Development.
SECTION 34.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 4 (3), chapter 475, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the Oregon Business Development  Department, for
infrastructure, is increased by $165,205, for administrative expenses  related to addressing
drinking water system contaminants.
SECTION 35. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 1 (2), chapter 379, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts and moneys appropriated to the Employ-
ment Department by sections  2 and 3, chapter 379, Oregon Laws 2023, but excluding lottery
funds and federal funds  other than those described in section 2, chapter 379, Oregon Laws
2023, collected or received by the Employment  Department, for the Office of Administrative
Hearings, is increased by $99,436, for a legal secretary position.
SECTION 36. In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Housing and Community Services Department, for the biennium  ending June
30, 2025, out  of the General Fund, the amount of $39,000,000, for deposit into the Long-Term
Rent Assistance Fund established by ORS 458.392, for rental assistance,  supportive services,
outreach and other costs  associated with rehousing people experiencing, or at risk of expe-
riencing, homelessness.
SECTION 37. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2,  chapter 390, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium ending
June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses for operations,  from fees,
moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds  from the
United States Department of Housing and Urban Development for contract services, but  ex-
cluding lottery  funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 390, Oregon Laws
2023, collected or received by the Housing and Community Services Department, is increased
by $25,000,000, for expenditures from the Long-Term Rent Assistance Fund established by
ORS 458.392.
SECTION 38. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 1 (5), chapter 354, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected  or received by the Department of Consumer and Business Services, for the
Division of Financial Regulation, is increased by $1,213,647, for staffing.
SECTION 39. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 1 (5), chapter 354, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the Department of Consumer and Business Services, for  the
Division of Financial Regulation,  is increased by $55,658, for a position compensation adjust-
ment.
SECTION 40. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 1 (2), chapter 354, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 5
funds, collected or received by the Department of Consumer and Business Services, for  the
Workers’ Compensation Division, is increased by $15,086, for a  position compensation ad-
justment.
SECTION 41. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 1 (3), chapter 354, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the Department  of Consumer and Business Services, for
Oregon OSHA, is increased by $66,455, for position compensation adjustments.
SECTION 42. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (1), chapter 354, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30,  2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds
collected or received by the Department of Consumer and Business Services, for Oregon
OSHA, is increased by $26,057, for position compensation adjustments.
SECTION 43.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 1 (4), chapter 354, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the Department of Consumer and Business Services, for  the
Central Services Division, is increased by $563,225,  for additional staffing and position com-
pensation adjustments.
SECTION 44. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 1 (6), chapter 354, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the Department of Consumer and Business Services, for  the
Building Codes Division, is increased by $193,394, for position compensation adjustments.
SECTION 45. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$631,615 is established for the biennium ending  June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Bureau of Labor and Industries from American Rescue Plan Act
Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys received  by the Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services and transferred to  the Bureau of Labor and Industries, for the Regis-
tered Apprenticeship Program.
SECTION 46.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 1, chapter 474, Oregon Laws 2023,  for the biennium ending
June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees,  moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,
collected or received by the Oregon State Board  of Nursing, is increased by $512,160, for
management, investigation and administrative positions.
SECTION 47.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 1,  chapter 479, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium ending
June 30, 2025, as  the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,
collected or received by the State Board of Pharmacy, is increased  by $138,752, for a com-
pliance position and a position compensation adjustment.
SECTION 48.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 4 (4), chapter 350, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds other
than those described in section 2, chapter  350, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by the
State Department of Agriculture, for market access, is increased by $4,500,000, for  resilient
food systems, specialty crops and food safety.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 6
SECTION 49. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Columbia River Gorge Commission by section 1,  chapter 352, Oregon Laws 2023,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, is increased by $138,000, for  a Climate Science Pro-
gram position.
SECTION 50. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Columbia River Gorge Commission by section 1,  chapter 352, Oregon Laws 2023,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, is increased by $50,000, for a  diversity, equity and
inclusion initiative.
SECTION 51. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 4,  chapter 451, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium ending
June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of  expenses from federal funds collected
or received by the State Department of Energy,  is increased by $4,727,985, for the adminis-
tration of the Grid Resilience State and Tribal Formula grant.
SECTION 52. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2,  chapter 451, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium ending
June 30, 2025, as  the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,
collected or received by  the State Department of Energy is increased by $500,000, for the
development of Oregon’s Comprehensive Climate Action Plan.
SECTION 53.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (4), chapter 452, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, the proceeds of bonds for the Orphan  Site
Account and federal funds from congestion mitigation  and air quality grants, drinking water
protection, laboratory accreditation and woodstove grants and for  smoke monitoring labo-
ratory services, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2,
chapter 452, Oregon Laws  2023, collected or received by the Department of Environmental
Quality, for agency management, is increased  by $1,009,000, for information technology ex-
penditures.
SECTION 54. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the State Forestry Department by section 1 (1), chapter 453, Oregon Laws  2023, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for fire protection, is increased by $32,649,494, for  wildfire
costs associated with the 2023 fire season.
SECTION 55. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (2), chapter 453, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and including federal funds from the United
States Forest Service for fire protection and for research projects, but excluding  lottery
funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter  453, Oregon Laws 2023, collected
or received by the State Forestry Department, for fire  protection, is increased by $49,354,211,
for processing payments associated with the 2023 fire season.
SECTION 56. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 4 (4), chapter 453, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses federal funds other than
those described in section 2, chapter 453, Oregon Laws 2023,  collected or received by the
State Forestry Department, for forest resources, is increased by $35,474,933,  for implemen-
tation of federally funded forestry programs.
SECTION 57. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department  of Land Conservation and Development by section 1 (1), chapter 455,
Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025,  for the planning program, is in-
creased by $607,000, for a deputy director position and position compensation adjustments.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 7
SECTION 58. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Land Use Board of Appeals by section  1, chapter 456, Oregon Laws 2023, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2025, is increased by $5,830, for a strategic plan.
SECTION 59. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 1 (1), chapter 459, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds, federal  funds
and funds described in sections 2 to 5, chapter 459, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or  received
by the Department of State Lands, for Common School Fund programs, is increased  by
$4,446,170, for the implementation of the Land Administration System Replacement Project.
SECTION 60. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 4 (4), chapter 460, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds other
than those described in section 3, chapter  460, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by the
Water Resources Department, for technical services, is increased by $1,279,408, for dam re-
habilitation.
SECTION 61.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 4 (4), chapter 460, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds other
than those described in section 3, chapter  460, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by the
Water Resources Department, for technical services, is increased by $152,244, for dam safety
activities.
SECTION 62.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 3 (4), chapter 460, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts  and including federal funds received under
cooperative agreements with or contracts from the Bureau  of Reclamation of the United
States Department of the Interior, the United States  Army Corps of Engineers, the United
States Geological Survey, the  Bonneville Power Administration and the National Fish and
Wildlife Foundation, but excluding lottery funds and  federal funds not described in section
3, chapter 460,  Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by the Water Resources Department,
for technical services, is increased by $300,000, for the Walla Walla Groundwater  Study with
the Washington Department of Ecology.
SECTION 63. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (9), chapter 363, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received as reimburse-
ment from the United States Department of Transportation, but  excluding lottery funds and
federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 363, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received
by the Department of Transportation,  for public transportation, is increased by $60,000,000,
for disbursements from the Statewide Transportation Improvement Fund.
SECTION 64. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3 (2), chapter 363, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds other
than those described in section 2, chapter  363, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by the
Department of Transportation, for commerce and  compliance, is increased by $2,000,000, for
Motor Carrier Safety Assistance Program grant funds.
SECTION 65.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (2), chapter 375, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 375, Oregon
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 8
Laws 2023, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for
the Chief Financial Office, is increased by $342,696, for organizational staffing changes.
SECTION 66. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (3)(a), chapter 375, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 375, Oregon
Laws 2023, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for
the Office of the State Chief Information Officer, for policy, is increased  by $571,543, for or-
ganizational staffing changes.
SECTION 67.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (4), chapter 375, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 375, Oregon
Laws 2023, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for
the Chief Human Resources Office, is  increased by $437,155, for organizational staffing
changes.
SECTION 68.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (7), chapter 375, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 375, Oregon
Laws 2023, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for
Enterprise Goods and Services, is increased by $704,690, for organizational staffing changes.
SECTION 69.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (2), chapter 375, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 375, Oregon
Laws 2023, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for
the Chief Financial Office, is increased by $8,486, for position compensation adjustments.
SECTION 70.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (3)(a), chapter 375, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 375, Oregon
Laws 2023, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for
the Office of the State Chief Information Officer, for policy, is increased by  $43,284, for po-
sition compensation adjustments.
SECTION 71.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (4), chapter 375, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 375, Oregon
Laws 2023, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for
the Chief Human Resources Office, is increased by  $75,666, for position compensation ad-
justments.
SECTION 72.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (5)(a), chapter 375, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges,
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 9
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 375, Oregon
Laws 2023, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for
the Office of the State Chief Information Officer - State  Data Center, for operations, is in-
creased by $12,843, for position compensation adjustments.
SECTION 73. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (6), chapter 375, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 375, Oregon
Laws 2023, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for
Enterprise Asset Management, is increased by $191,921,  for position compensation adjust-
ments.
SECTION 74.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (7), chapter 375, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 375, Oregon
Laws 2023, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for
Enterprise Goods and Services, is increased  by $440,160, for position compensation adjust-
ments.
SECTION 75.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Revenue by section 1 (3), chapter 361,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2025, for  the Personal Tax and Compliance Division, is increased
by $226,624, for the collection and administration of the Pass Through  Entity Elective tax
extension.
SECTION 76. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (3), chapter 361, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts  and reimbursements from federal service
agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter
361, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by the Department of Revenue, for the  Personal
Tax and Compliance Division, is increased by $4,625, for the collection and administration of
the Pass Through Entity Elective tax extension.
SECTION 77.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Revenue by section 1 (6), chapter 361,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2025, for the Information Technology Services Division, is increased
by $236,799, for the collection and administration of  the 9-8-8 tax and the Electronic Valu-
ation Information System project.
SECTION 78.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (7), chapter 361, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts  and reimbursements from federal service
agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter
361, Oregon Laws  2023, collected or received by the Department of Revenue, for the Infor-
mation Technology Services Division, is increased by $70,732, for the collection  and adminis-
tration of the 9-8-8 tax and the Electronic Valuation Information System project.
SECTION 79.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Revenue by section 1 (3), chapter 361,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2025, for  the Personal Tax and Compliance Division, is increased
by $339,946, for the verification of tax returns and fraud prevention for the child tax credit.
SECTION 80. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (3), chapter 361, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 10
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and  reimbursements from federal service
agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter
361, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by the Department of Revenue, for the  Personal
Tax and Compliance Division, is increased by $6,937, for the  verification of tax returns and
fraud prevention for the child tax credit.
SECTION 81.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Revenue by section 1 (3), chapter 361,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2025, for the Personal Tax  and Compliance Division, is increased
by $339,936, for the Certificates of Tax Compliance program.
SECTION 82. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (3), chapter 361, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts  and reimbursements from federal service
agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter
361, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by the Department of Revenue, for the  Personal
Tax and Compliance Division, is increased by $6,938,  for the Certificates of Tax Compliance
program.
SECTION 83.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Revenue by section 1 (4), chapter 361,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2025, for the Business Division, is increased by  $191,871, for the
Certificates of Tax Compliance program.
SECTION 84. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (4), chapter 361, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts  and reimbursements from federal service
agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter
361, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by the Department of Revenue,  for the Business
Division, is increased by $155,002, for the Certificates of Tax Compliance program.
SECTION 85.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Revenue by section 1 (6), chapter 361,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2025, for the Information Technology Services Division, is increased
by $108,431, for the Certificates of Tax Compliance program.
SECTION 86.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (7), chapter 361, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts  and reimbursements from federal service
agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter
361, Oregon Laws  2023, collected or received by the Department of Revenue, for the Infor-
mation Technology Services Division, is increased by $32,389, for the Certificates of Tax
Compliance program.
SECTION 87.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (1), chapter 458, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the Secretary of State, for the  Administrative Services Divi-
sion, is increased by $358,090, for position compensation adjustments and  completion of a
facility upgrade project.
SECTION 88. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (5), chapter 458, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 11
funds, collected or received by  the Secretary of State, for the Corporation Division, is in-
creased by $557,000, for the digitization of business records.
SECTION 89. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 1 (1), chapter 457, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the Public Employees  Retirement System, for the Central
Administration Division, is increased by $142,956, for a position compensation adjustment.
SECTION 90. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3,  chapter 384, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium ending
June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit  for payment of expenses from moneys received from the
assessment against state agencies described in ORS  357.203 and transferred to the Miscella-
neous Receipts Account for  the State Library, is increased by $200,000, for the cataloging of
federal publications and a software program to provide public  access to digitized Oregon
government publications.
SECTION 91. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Emergency Board by section 6 (1), chapter 605, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the
biennium ending June 30, 2025, to be  allocated to the Department of Justice for expenses of
district attorneys  for victim assistance, investigation and temporary staffing and other one-
time, nonroutine prosecution expenses related to  nonunanimous jury convictions, is de-
creased by $1,000,000.
SECTION 92. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Emergency Board by section 8 (1), chapter 605, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the
biennium ending June 30, 2025, to  be allocated for expenses related to the unrepresented
defendants/persons crisis, is decreased by $5,000,000.
SECTION 93. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Emergency Board by section 113 (1), chapter 605, Oregon Laws  2023, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2025, to be allocated for the  transfer of the Public Defense Services
Commission to the executive branch, is decreased by $1,238,810.
SECTION 94. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Emergency  Board by section 290 (1), chapter 605, Oregon Laws 2023, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2025,  to be allocated to the Housing and Community Services De-
partment to pay for long term rental assistance, is decreased by $39,000,000.
SECTION 95. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to  the Emergency Board by section 5 (1), chapter 453, Oregon Laws 2023, for the
biennium ending June  30, 2025, to be allocated to the State Forestry Department for fire
protection expenses, is decreased by $6,521,981.
SECTION 96. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to  the Emergency Board by section 4 (1), chapter 605, Oregon Laws 2023, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2025, to be  allocated to state agencies for compensation changes
driven by collective bargaining for workers who are not state employees,  is decreased by
$75,000,000.
SECTION 97. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Emergency Board by section 2 (1), chapter 605, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the
biennium ending June 30, 2025, to be allocated to state  agencies for state employee compen-
sation changes, is decreased by $330,000,000.
SECTION 98. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Emergency Board by section 3 (1), chapter 605, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the
biennium ending June 30, 2025, to be allocated to state  agencies for additional compensation
changes to support state employee recruitment and retention, is decreased by $120,000,000.
SECTION 99. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Early Learning and  Care by section 1 (2), chapter 448, Oregon
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 12
Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025,  for Early Learning Programs, is increased
by $1,830,240, for updates to the  Oregon Eligibility (ONE) system and the implementation of
chapter 595, Oregon Laws 2023.
SECTION 100. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department  of Early Learning and Care by section 1 (1), chapter 448,
Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for operations, is decreased  by
$1,830,240, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 101. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 8 (1), chapter  454, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds and funds described in  sections 12 to 16, chapter 454, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for programs and related grants,
is decreased by $4,900,000, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 102.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$2,500,000 is established for the  biennium ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by  the Higher Education Coordinating Commission from the Oregon
Cybersecurity Center of Excellence  Operating Fund established by section 8, chapter 489,
Oregon Laws 2023, for public university state programs.
SECTION 103. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$2,150,000 is established for the  biennium ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by  the Higher Education Coordinating Commission from the Oregon
Cybersecurity Workforce Development  Fund established by section 9, chapter 489, Oregon
Laws 2023, for public university state programs.
SECTION 104. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$250,000 is established for the biennium ending  June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by  the Higher Education Coordinating Commission from the Oregon
Cybersecurity Grant Program Fund established by section  10, chapter 489, Oregon Laws 2023,
for public university state programs.
SECTION 105. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Commission for  the Blind by section 1, chapter 376, Oregon Laws 2023, for
the biennium ending  June 30, 2025, is decreased by $267,844, for a budget realignment and
position establishment.
SECTION 106. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department  of Corrections by section 1 (1), chapter 377, Oregon Laws 2023,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for operations and health services, is decreased by
$213,056, for a budget realignment of the K-9 unit.
SECTION 107.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department  of Corrections by section 1 (2), chapter 377, Oregon Laws 2023,
for the biennium ending  June 30, 2025, for central administration and administrative ser-
vices, is increased by $213,056, for a budget realignment of the K-9 unit.
SECTION 108. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of
$324,094 is established for the biennium ending June 30,  2025, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Department of Justice,  from American Rescue Plan Act
Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys received  by the Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services and transferred to the Department of Justice, for crime victim and
survivor services, for survivor housing.
SECTION 109.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (1), chapter 357,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 13
funds, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Emergency Management,  for ad-
ministration, is decreased by $50,000, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 110. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (3), chapter 357,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the Oregon  Department of Emergency Management, for
Preparedness and Response, is increased by $50,000, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 111. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2, chapter  224, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees,  moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,
collected or received by the Department of the State Fire Marshal, is  increased by $52,945,
for the reclassification of the State Fire Marshal position.
SECTION 112.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 3, chapter  380, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2025, as the  maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds other
than those described in section 2, chapter  380, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by the
Judicial Department, is increased by $3,100,000, for federal grants.
SECTION 113. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 141, chapter 605, Oregon  Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025,  as the maximum limit for payment of expenses by the Judicial De-
partment from the Oregon Courthouse Capital Construction and Improvement  Fund estab-
lished by section 64,  chapter 723, Oregon Laws 2013, is increased by $95,399,999, for the
project costs for the Clackamas County Courthouse.
SECTION 114. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 139, chapter  605, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses by  the Judicial De-
partment from the  Oregon Courthouse Capital Construction and Improvement Fund estab-
lished by section 64, chapter 723, Oregon Laws 2013, is increased by  $20,730,000, for the
project costs for the Benton County Courthouse.
SECTION 115. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 140, chapter 605, Oregon  Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025,  as the maximum limit for payment of expenses by the Judicial De-
partment from the Oregon Courthouse Capital Construction and Improvement  Fund estab-
lished by section 64, chapter 723, Oregon Laws 2013, is  increased by $20,383,129, for local
matching funds for the project costs for the Benton County Courthouse.
SECTION 116. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of
$16,330,000 is established for the biennium ending June 30,  2025, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Judicial Department  from the Oregon Courthouse Capital Con-
struction and Improvement Fund established by section 64,  chapter 723, Oregon Laws 2013,
for the project costs for the Crook County Courthouse.
SECTION 117. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of
$16,116,705 is established for the biennium ending June 30,  2025, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Judicial Department  from the Oregon Courthouse Capital Con-
struction and Improvement Fund established by section 64,  chapter 723, Oregon Laws 2013,
for local matching funds for the project costs for the Crook County Courthouse.
SECTION 118. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Business Development Department by section 2 (1), chapter 475,
Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for infrastructure, for Rivoli the-
ater restoration, is decreased by $455,599, for a budget realignment.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 14
SECTION 119. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Business Development Department by section 2 (3), chapter 475,
Oregon Laws 2023,  for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for infrastructure, for St. Helens
waterfront redevelopment, is increased by $293,122, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 120.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Business Development Department by section 2 (4), chapter 475,
Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for infrastructure,  for municipal
building departments financial assistance grants, is decreased by $340,312, for a budget rea-
lignment.
SECTION 121.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Business Development Department by section 2 (5), chapter 475,
Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for infrastructure,  for a Sweet
Home wastewater treatment plant upgrade, is decreased by $3,500,000, for a  budget realign-
ment.
SECTION 121a.
 Section 2, chapter 475, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 2.  In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there are appropriated to the
Oregon Business Development Department, for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the
General Fund, for infrastructure, the following amounts for the following purposes:
(1) Rivoli theater restoration ............... $ 750,000
(2) Port of Coos Bay navigation
channel ................................................$ 10,000,000
(3) St. Helens waterfront
redevelopment .................................... $ 684,000
(4) Municipal building departments
financial assistance grants ............. $ 1,000,000
(5) Sweet Home wastewater
[treatment plan upgrade ................... $ 3,500,000]
treatment plant upgrade ........... $ 3,500,000
(6) Warm Springs water and
wastewater systems .......................... $ 5,737,479
SECTION 122.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Business Development Department by section 2 (6), chapter 475,
Oregon Laws  2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for infrastructure, for Warm
Springs water and wastewater systems, is decreased by $2,031,677, for a budget  realignment.
SECTION 123.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Business Development Department by section 3 (1), chapter 475,
Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for business, innovation and trade,
for the Emerging Opportunities Program, is decreased by  $11,187,872, for a budget realign-
ment.
SECTION 124.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Business Development Department by section 3 (2), chapter 475,
Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for business, innovation and trade,
for municipal wildfire assistance, is increased by $464,108, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 125.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 1 (1), chapter 379,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and moneys appropriated to the  Employ-
ment Department by sections 2 and 3, chapter 379, Oregon Laws 2023,  but excluding lottery
funds and federal funds other than those described in section 2, chapter  379, Oregon Laws
2023, collected or received by the Employment  Department, for unemployment insurance,
shared services, workforce operations, contributions and recovery,  and workforce and eco-
nomic research, is decreased by $7,566,963, for a budget realignment.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 15
SECTION 126. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 1 (4), chapter 379,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and moneys appropriated to the  Employ-
ment Department by sections 2 and 3, chapter 379, Oregon Laws 2023,  but excluding lottery
funds and federal funds other than those described in section 2, chapter  379, Oregon Laws
2023, collected or received by the Employment Department, for the  Modernization Initiative,
is decreased by $12,974,263, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 127. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 4, chapter 379, Oregon Laws  2023, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds, other
than those described in section 2, chapter  379, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by the
Employment Department, is increased by $20,541,226, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 128.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 1 (1), chapter  379, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts and moneys appropriated to the Employ-
ment Department by sections  2 and 3, chapter 379, Oregon Laws 2023, but excluding lottery
funds and federal funds  other than those described in section 2, chapter 379, Oregon Laws
2023, collected or received by  the Employment Department, for unemployment insurance,
shared services, workforce operations, contributions  and recovery, and workforce and eco-
nomic research, is increased by $7,272,663, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 129. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 1 (3), chapter  379, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts and moneys appropriated to the Employ-
ment Department by sections  2 and 3, chapter 379, Oregon Laws 2023, but excluding lottery
funds and federal funds  other than those described in section 2, chapter 379, Oregon Laws
2023, collected or received by the Employment Department, for the family and  medical leave
insurance program, is decreased by $3,676,216, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 130. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 1 (4), chapter  379, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts and moneys appropriated to the Employ-
ment Department by sections  2 and 3, chapter 379, Oregon Laws 2023, but excluding lottery
funds and federal funds  other than those described in section 2, chapter 379, Oregon Laws
2023, collected or received by the Employment Department, for the  Modernization Initiative,
is decreased by $3,596,447, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 131. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 1, chapter 60, Oregon Laws 2023, for the  biennium ending
June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees,  moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,
collected or received by the State Board of Chiropractic Examiners, is decreased by $26,514.
SECTION 132.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 6, chapter 62, Oregon Laws 2023, for the  biennium ending
June 30, 2025, as  the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,
collected or received by the Oregon State Veterinary Medical Examining Board, is  increased
by $43,762, for a position compensation adjustment.
SECTION 133.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (3), chapter  350, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 16
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, and  including federal funds for contract
services, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 350,
Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by the State  Department of Agriculture, for natural
resources, is increased by $978,928, for projects  approved by the Oregon Climate Action
Commission.
SECTION 134.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State Department of  Energy by section 1 (1), chapter 451, Oregon Laws
2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for energy development services, is increased
by $1,310,268, for energy efficiency incentives for 2020 wildfire survivors.
SECTION 135.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2, chapter 451, Oregon Laws  2023, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees,  moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,
collected or received by the State Department of Energy, is increased by $31,976,609, for
continuation of energy incentive programs.
SECTION 136.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State Department of Energy by section  1 (1), chapter 451, Oregon Laws
2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for  energy development services, is decreased
by $2,103,327.
SECTION 137. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State Department of  Energy by section 1 (2), chapter 451, Oregon Laws
2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for nuclear safety and emergency response, is
increased by $2,103,327, for the purpose of carrying out sections 2 to 8,  chapter 562, Oregon
Laws 2023.
SECTION 138.
 Section 3, chapter 452, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 3.  Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of $6,453,619  is estab-
lished for the biennium  beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from
lottery moneys allocated from the Parks and Natural Resources Fund to  the Department of Envi-
ronmental Quality for activities  and projects to implement Article XV, [ section 4 (8) ] section 4b , of
the Oregon Constitution.
SECTION 139. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (1), chapter  452, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, the proceeds of bonds for the Orphan  Site
Account and federal funds from congestion mitigation  and air quality grants, drinking water
protection, laboratory accreditation and  woodstove grants and for smoke monitoring labo-
ratory services but excluding lottery funds  and federal funds not described in section 2,
chapter 452, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by the  Department of Environmental
Quality, for air quality, is decreased by $684,675, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 140. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (2), chapter  452, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, the proceeds of bonds for the Orphan  Site
Account and federal funds from congestion mitigation  and air quality grants, drinking water
protection, laboratory accreditation and  woodstove grants and for smoke monitoring labo-
ratory services but excluding lottery funds  and federal funds not described in section 2,
chapter 452, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by the  Department of Environmental
Quality, for water quality, is increased by $1,196,622.
SECTION 141. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (4), chapter  452, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, the proceeds of bonds for the Orphan  Site
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 17
Account and federal funds from congestion mitigation  and air quality grants, drinking water
protection, laboratory accreditation and  woodstove grants and for smoke monitoring labo-
ratory services but excluding lottery funds  and federal funds not described in section 2,
chapter 452, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by the  Department of Environmental
Quality, for agency management, is increased by $838,577, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 142. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 6, chapter  452, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses  by the Department of En-
vironmental Quality from American Rescue  Plan Act Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery
Fund moneys received by the Oregon Department  of Administrative Services and transferred
to the Department of Environmental  Quality, for the Onsite Septic Financial Aid Program,
is decreased by $1,350,524.
SECTION 143. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (2), chapter 590,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts and including federal funds from the Pacific
Coastal Salmon Recovery Fund, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds  not described
in section 2, chapter 590, Oregon Laws 2023,  collected or received by the State Department
of Fish and Wildlife, for the Wildlife Division, is increased by $800,000, for  the acquisition of
Disaster Peak Ranch.
SECTION 144. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 4 (2), chapter 590,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds other
than those described in section 2, chapter  590, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by the
State Department of Fish  and Wildlife, for the Wildlife Division, is increased by $2,750,000,
for the acquisition of Disaster Peak Ranch.
SECTION 145.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State  Department of Fish and Wildlife by section 1 (3), chapter 590, Oregon
Laws 2023, for the biennium ending  June 30, 2025, for the Administrative Services Division,
is increased by $17,000, to support the Private Forest Accord.
SECTION 146. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State  Department of Fish and Wildlife by section 1 (7), chapter 590, Oregon
Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for the Habitat Division, is increased by
$85,000, to support the Private Forest Accord.
SECTION 147. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (7), chapter  590, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts and including federal funds from the Pacific
Coastal Salmon Recovery  Fund, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described
in section 2, chapter 590, Oregon Laws 2023,  collected or received by the State Department
of Fish and Wildlife, for the Habitat Division,  is increased by $2,445,865, for projects approved
by the Oregon Climate Action Commission.
SECTION 148. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (4), chapter 453,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and including federal funds from the United
States Forest Service for fire protection and for research projects, but excluding  lottery
funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter  453, Oregon Laws 2023, collected
or received by the State  Forestry Department, for forest resources, is increased by
$3,250,000, for forestry natural climate solutions activities.
SECTION 149. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (7), chapter 453,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 18
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and including federal funds from the United
States Forest Service for fire protection and for research projects, but excluding  lottery
funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter  453, Oregon Laws 2023, collected
or received by the State Forestry Department, for debt  service, is increased by $64,229, for
a budget realignment.
SECTION 150. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (1), chapter 453,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and including federal funds from the United
States Forest Service for fire protection and for research projects, but excluding  lottery
funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter  453, Oregon Laws 2023, collected
or received by the State Forestry Department, for  agency administration, is decreased by
$64,229, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 151. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (8), chapter 453,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and including federal funds from the United
States Forest Service for fire protection and for research projects, but excluding  lottery
funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter  453, Oregon Laws 2023, collected
or received by the State Forestry Department, for an equipment pool,  is increased by
$840,000.
SECTION 152. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (4), chapter 453,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and including federal funds from the United
States Forest Service for fire protection and for research projects, but excluding  lottery
funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter  453, Oregon Laws 2023, collected
or received by the State Forestry Department, for forest resources, is decreased by $90,000.
SECTION 153. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State Forestry Department by section 1 (2), chapter 453, Oregon  Laws
2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for forest  resources, is decreased by $10,000,000,
for the Landscape Resiliency Fund established by section 4, chapter 611, Oregon Laws 2023.
SECTION 154. In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the  State Forestry Department, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $10,000,000, for deposit into the  Landscape Resiliency Fund es-
tablished by section 4, chapter 611, Oregon Laws 2023.
SECTION 155. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (4), chapter 453,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and including federal funds from the United
States Forest Service for fire protection and for research projects, but excluding  lottery
funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter  453, Oregon Laws 2023, collected
or received by the State  Forestry Department, for forest resources, is increased by
$10,000,000, for landscape resilience projects and implementing ORS 477.503.
SECTION 156. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 5, chapter 459, Oregon Laws  2023, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of  expenses by the Department of State
Lands from the Oregon Ocean Science Fund established by ORS  196.567, is increased by
$572,019, for the Oregon Ocean Science Trust Research Grant Program.
SECTION 157. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 6 (2), chapter  459, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 19
ending June 30,  2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds
collected or  received by the Department of State Lands, for Common School Fund programs,
is decreased by $500,000.
SECTION 158. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 1 (1), chapter 459,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds, federal  funds
and funds described in sections 2 to 5, chapter 459, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or  received
by the Department of State Lands, for Common School Fund programs, is increased  by
$500,000, for the expenditure of United States  Department of Housing and Urban Develop-
ment grant funds transferred from the Oregon Department of Administrative Services.
SECTION 159. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made  to the Water Resources Department by section 1 (1), chapter 460, Oregon Laws
2023, for the biennium ending June 30,  2025, for administrative services, is decreased by
$590,768, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 160. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Water Resources Department by section 1 (2), chapter 460, Oregon  Laws
2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for field services, is decreased by $186,647, for
a budget realignment.
SECTION 161.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made  to the Water Resources Department by section 1 (3), chapter 460, Oregon Laws
2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for water rights  and adjudications, is decreased
by $825,784, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 162. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Water Resources Department by section 1 (4), chapter 460, Oregon  Laws
2023, for the biennium ending  June 30, 2025, for technical services, is increased by $471,069,
for a budget realignment.
SECTION 163. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made  to the Water Resources Department by section 1 (5), chapter 460, Oregon Laws
2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for the  director’s office, is increased by
$1,132,130, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 164. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3 (1), chapter 460,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and including  federal funds received under
cooperative agreements with or contracts from  the Bureau of Reclamation of the United
States Department of the Interior, the United  States Army Corps of Engineers, the United
States Geological Survey, the Bonneville Power Administration and the  National Fish and
Wildlife Foundation, but excluding lottery funds and  federal funds not described in section
3, chapter 460,  Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by the Water Resources Department,
for administrative services, is increased by $302, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 165. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3 (2), chapter 460,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and including  federal funds received under
cooperative agreements with or contracts from  the Bureau of Reclamation of the United
States Department of the Interior, the United  States Army Corps of Engineers, the United
States Geological Survey, the Bonneville Power Administration and the  National Fish and
Wildlife Foundation, but excluding lottery funds and  federal funds not described in section
3, chapter 460,  Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by the Water Resources Department,
for field services, is increased by $20,815, for a budget realignment.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 20
SECTION 166. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3 (3), chapter 460,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and including  federal funds received under
cooperative agreements with or contracts from  the Bureau of Reclamation of the United
States Department of the Interior, the United  States Army Corps of Engineers, the United
States Geological Survey, the Bonneville Power Administration and the  National Fish and
Wildlife Foundation, but excluding lottery funds and  federal funds not described in section
3, chapter 460,  Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by the Water Resources Department,
for water rights and adjudications, is decreased by $38,803, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 167. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3 (4), chapter 460,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and including  federal funds received under
cooperative agreements with or contracts from  the Bureau of Reclamation of the United
States Department of the Interior, the United  States Army Corps of Engineers, the United
States Geological Survey, the Bonneville Power Administration and the  National Fish and
Wildlife Foundation, but excluding lottery funds and  federal funds not described in section
3, chapter 460,  Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by the Water Resources Department,
for technical services, is increased by $17,686, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 168. Section 232, chapter 605, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 232. In addition to and not in lieu  of any other appropriation, there are appropriated to the
Water Resources Department, for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the
following amounts, for the provision of grants to the following entities, for the following purposes:
(1) City of Beaverton, South Cooper Mountain Nonpotable (Purple Pipe) Project: $2,500,000.
(2) North Unit Irrigation District, Infrastructure Modernization Project: $2,000,000.
(3) Deschutes River Conservancy, Conserving Water  Through Piping and Improved Monitoring
and Measurement: $1,500,000.
(4) Rogue River Irrigation District, Fourmile Creek Project: $1,530,000.
(5) City of Monroe Water, Prefilter and Automated Controls Infrastructure: $1,500,000.
(6) City of St. Paul, Water Reservoir Improvement Project: $636,000.
(7) City of Bay City, Earthquake Isolation Valves for Water Reservoirs: $225,000.
(8) City of Halsey, New Well: $300,000.
(9) City of Sodaville, [ Jackson Well Conversion to Municipal Use ] Water System Expansion :
$370,000.
(10) City of Falls City, Water Main Line Replacement Project: $591,750.
SECTION 169.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 7 (2), chapter 603,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected  or received by the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board, for grants, is
decreased by $203,516, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 170. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 7 (1), chapter  603, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the Oregon Watershed Enhancement  Board, for operations,
is increased by $203,516, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 171. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (15), chapter 375, Oregon Laws 2023,  for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges,
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 21
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 375, Oregon
Laws 2023, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for
special governmental payments, is increased by  $111,399,294, for disbursement of lottery bond
proceeds carried forward from the prior biennium.
SECTION 172. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (15), chapter 375, Oregon Laws 2023,  for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 375, Oregon
Laws 2023, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for
special governmental payments, is decreased by $13,650,000, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 173.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of
$6,950,000 is established for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, as  the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts
and federal funds received from charges, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds  not
described in this section, collected or received  by the Oregon Department of Administrative
Services, for Mill Creek land sales.
SECTION 174.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of
$6,700,000 is established for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, as  the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by  the Oregon Department of Administrative Services for the Oregon
Worker  Relief  program from the Universal Representation Fund established under section
1, chapter 88, Oregon Laws 2022.
SECTION 175. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (3)(b), chapter 375, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 375, Oregon
Laws 2023, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for
the Office of  the State Chief Information Officer, for Microsoft 365, is decreased by
$2,000,000, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 176.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (5)(a), chapter 375, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 375, Oregon
Laws 2023, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for
the Office  of the State Chief Information Officer - State Data Center, for operations, is de-
creased by $300,000, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 177.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (3)(a), chapter 375, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 375, Oregon
Laws 2023, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for
the Office of the State Chief Information Officer, for policy,  is increased by $2,300,000, for a
budget realignment.
SECTION 178.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (7), chapter 361,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts  and reimbursements from federal service
agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter
361, Oregon Laws  2023, collected or received by the Department of Revenue, for the Infor-
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 22
mation Technology Services Division, is increased by $77,000, for  tax processing software for
the 9-8-8 tax.
SECTION 179. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of  Revenue by section 1 (6), chapter 361, Oregon Laws 2023,
for the biennium  ending June 30, 2025, for the Information Technology Services Division, is
decreased by $77,000, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 180. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 1 (3), chapter  457, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the Public  Employees Retirement System, for the Information
Services Division, is decreased by $1,735,246, for the reorganization of the  Electronic Content
Management Section.
SECTION 181. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 1 (1), chapter  457, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the  Public Employees Retirement System, for the Central
Administration Division, is increased by $1,580,287, for the reorganization of the  Electronic
Content Management Section.
SECTION 182. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 1 (5), chapter  457, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the Public  Employees Retirement System, for the Compliance,
Audit and Risk Division, is increased  by $154,959, for the reorganization of the Electronic
Content Management Section.
SECTION 183. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 1, chapter 615, Oregon Laws  2023, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees,  moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,
collected or received by Oregon Racing Commission, is decreased  by $38,525, for a position
reduction.
SECTION 184.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (1), chapter 610, Oregon Laws
2023, for the biennium ending June  30, 2025, for central services, is increased by $1,198,989,
for a budget realignment.
SECTION 185. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (1), chapter 610,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery,  Social Security Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section 2, chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by  the Depart-
ment of Human Services, for central services, is decreased by $7,899, for  a budget realign-
ment.
SECTION 186. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3 (1), chapter 610,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30,  2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Department of Human Services, for central  services, is increased by $318,599,
for a budget realignment.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 23
SECTION 187. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (2), chapter 610, Oregon Laws
2023, for the  biennium ending June 30, 2025, for state assessments and enterprise-wide costs,
is increased by $3,861,208, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 188. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (2), chapter 610,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery,  Social Security Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section 2, chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by  the Depart-
ment of Human Services, for state assessments and enterprise-wide costs, is increased by
$59,644, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 189.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3 (2), chapter 610,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30,  2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Department of  Human Services, for state assessments and enterprise-wide
costs, is increased by $1,006,105, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 190. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (8), chapter  610, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery, Social Security  Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section  2, chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by the Depart-
ment of  Human Services, for shared services, is increased by $1,473,073, for a budget rea-
lignment.
SECTION 191. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (3), chapter 610, Oregon Laws
2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for  self-sufficiency programs, is increased by
$9,012,880, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 192. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (3), chapter  610, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery, Social Security  Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section  2, chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by the Depart-
ment of Human Services, for self-sufficiency programs, is  increased by $14,669,575, for a
budget realignment.
SECTION 193. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 3 (3), chapter  610, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 610,  Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Department of  Human Services, for self-sufficiency programs, is increased
by $95,765,407, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 194. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (4), chapter 610, Oregon Laws
2023, for the biennium  ending June 30, 2025, for vocational rehabilitation services, is in-
creased by $182,265, for a budget realignment.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 24
SECTION 195. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (4), chapter 610,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery, Social Security  Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section  2, chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by the Depart-
ment of Human Services, for vocational rehabilitation services, is increased by $180, for a
budget realignment.
SECTION 196.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 3 (4), chapter  610, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 610,  Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Department of Human Services, for vocational rehabilitation  services, is de-
creased by $70,871, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 197. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (5), chapter 610, Oregon Laws
2023, for the biennium ending  June 30, 2025, for child welfare programs, is increased by
$11,983,761, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 198. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (5), chapter 610,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery,  Social Security Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section 2, chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by  the Depart-
ment of Human Services, for child welfare programs,  is decreased by $5,691,842, for a budget
realignment.
SECTION 199. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 3 (5), chapter  610, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 610,  Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Department of Human Services, for child welfare programs, is increased by
$25,836,569, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 200.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (6), chapter 610, Oregon Laws
2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025,  for aging and people with disabilities programs,
is increased by $1,891,148, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 201. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (6), chapter 610,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery,  Social Security Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section 2, chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by  the Depart-
ment of Human Services,  for aging and people with disabilities programs, is decreased by
$2,828,164, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 202. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3 (6), chapter 610,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30,  2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 25
received by the Department of Human Services, for aging and people  with disabilities pro-
grams, is decreased by $13,568,795, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 203. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (7), chapter 610, Oregon Laws
2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for intellectual/developmental  disabilities pro-
grams, is increased by $91,879,064, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 204. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (7), chapter 610,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery,  Social Security Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section 2, chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by  the Depart-
ment of  Human Services, for intellectual/developmental disabilities programs, is increased
by $5,671,712, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 205. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3 (7), chapter 610,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30,  2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Department of Human Services, for intellectual/developmental disabilities
programs, is increased by $193,898,500, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 206.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (8), chapter 610, Oregon Laws
2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for Oregon Eligibility Partnership,  is decreased
by $11,211,235, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 207. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (9), chapter  610, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery, Social Security  Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section  2, chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by the Depart-
ment of Human Services,  for Oregon Eligibility Partnership, is increased by $2,036,225, for a
budget realignment.
SECTION 208. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 3 (8), chapter  610, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 610,  Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Department of Human Services, for Oregon Eligibility  Partnership, is de-
creased by $7,631,688, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 209. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Education by section 2 (2), chapter 449, Oregon Laws  2023,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for other K-12 grant-in-aid  programs, is increased by
$8,900,000, for providing stipends to licensed educators and classified school  employees
working in special education during the 2024-2025 school year.
SECTION 210. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Education by section 1 (1), chapter 449, Oregon Laws  2023,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2025,  for operations, is increased by $2,007,778, to address
a backlog of appeals of complaints alleging discrimination in public education.
SECTION 211. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Education by section 1 (1), chapter 449, Oregon Laws  2023,
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 26
for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for operations, is increased by $2,248,604,  to create
and maintain fiscal accountability and transparency dashboards.
SECTION 212. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Education by section 1 (1), chapter 449, Oregon Laws  2023,
for the biennium  ending June 30, 2025, for operations, is increased by $169,164, for a Summer
Electronic Benefits Transfer program to reduce hunger and food insecurity for children.
SECTION 213. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 8 (1), chapter  449, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
other than those described in  sections 9 and 15, chapter 449, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by  the Department of Education, for operations, is increased by $169,164, for a
Summer Electronic Benefits Transfer program to reduce hunger and food insecurity  for
children.
SECTION 214. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Early Learning and Care by section  1 (2), chapter 448,
Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for Early Learning Programs,  is
increased by $86,000,000,  to address caseload growth in the Employment Related Day Care
program.
SECTION 215. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 3 (4), chapter  448, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30,  2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds
collected or received by the Department of Early Learning and Care, for  Early Learning
Programs - American Rescue Plan Act, is increased  by $11,088,717, to address caseload
growth in the Employment Related Day Care program.
SECTION 216. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3 (2), chapter 448,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds
collected or received by the Department of Early Learning and Care, for  Operations -
American Rescue Plan Act, is decreased by $6,600,000.
NOTE: Section 217 was deleted. Subsequent sections were not renumbered.
SECTION 218. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department  of Early Learning and Care by section 1 (2), chapter 448,
Oregon Laws  2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for Early Learning Programs, is
increased by $250,000, for ONE Eligibility system changes.
SECTION 219. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Early Learning and Care by section  1 (1), chapter 448,
Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for  operations, is increased by
$822,489, to  address Direct Pay Unit workload issues and for communications for the Em-
ployment Related Day Care program.
SECTION 220. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Early Learning and Care by section  1 (1), chapter 448,
Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for  operations, is increased by
$3,726,173, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 221. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3 (1), chapter 448,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds
collected or received by the Department of Early Learning  and Care, for operations, is in-
creased by $123,951, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 222. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Commission for  the Blind by section 1, chapter 376, Oregon Laws 2023, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2025, is increased  by $524,866, for a budget realignment and
position compensation adjustments.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 27
SECTION 223. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3, chapter 376, Oregon Laws  2023, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds collected
or received by the Commission for the Blind, is decreased by $502,605, for a budget realign-
ment.
SECTION 224. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Columbia River Gorge Commission by section 1, chapter 352, Oregon Laws
2023, for the  biennium ending June 30, 2025, is increased by $21,000, for audit, central services
and position compensation adjustments.
SECTION 225. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (7), chapter  590, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts and including federal funds from the Pacific
Coastal Salmon Recovery  Fund, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described
in section 2, chapter 590, Oregon Laws 2023,  collected or received by the State Department
of Fish and Wildlife, for the Habitat Division, is  increased by $10,000,000, for the Private
Forest Accord Grant Program.
SECTION 226. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State  Department of Fish and Wildlife by section 1 (1), chapter 590, Oregon
Laws 2023, for the biennium ending  June 30, 2025, for the Fish Division, is increased by
$275,533, to pursue federal grants.
SECTION 227. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (1), chapter  590, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts and including federal funds from the Pacific
Coastal Salmon Recovery  Fund, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described
in section 2, chapter 590, Oregon Laws 2023,  collected or received by the State Department
of Fish and Wildlife, for the Fish Division, is increased by $81,330, to pursue federal grants.
SECTION 228. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State  Department of Fish and Wildlife by section 1 (3), chapter 590, Oregon
Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025,  for the Administrative Services Division,
is increased by $87,167, to pursue federal grants.
SECTION 229. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (3), chapter 590,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts and including federal funds from the Pacific
Coastal Salmon Recovery Fund, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds  not described
in section 2, chapter 590, Oregon Laws 2023,  collected or received by the State Department
of Fish and Wildlife, for the Administrative Services Division, is increased by $87,168, to
pursue federal grants.
SECTION 230.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$143,306 is established for the biennium ending  June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by  the State Parks and
Recreation Department, for debt service.
SECTION 231. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of
$1,755,115 is established for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, as  the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal  funds, collected or received by the Water Resources
Department, for debt service.
SECTION 232. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (2), chapter 361,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 28
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts  and reimbursements from federal service
agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter
361, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by the Department of Revenue,  for the Property
Tax Division, is decreased by $331,081.
SECTION 233.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of  Revenue by section 1 (2), chapter 361, Oregon Laws 2023,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for the Property Tax Division, is increased by $331,081,
for position compensation adjustments.
SECTION 234. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (1), chapter 458,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the Secretary of State, for the  Administrative Services Divi-
sion, is increased by $303,963, to authorize a general counsel position.
SECTION 235. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Secretary of  State by section 1 (2), chapter 458, Oregon Laws 2023, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2025, for the Elections Division, is  increased by $162,207, for an
investigator position.
SECTION 236. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Secretary of  State by section 1 (2), chapter 458, Oregon Laws 2023, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2025, for the Elections Division, is increased by  $151,523, for
Helpdesk support.
SECTION 237. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Emergency Board by section 89, chapter 605, Oregon Laws 2023, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2025, to be allocated to the Department  of Early Learning and Care
for expanding access  to the Employment Related Day Care program, is increased by
$64,000,000.
SECTION 238. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Emergency Board by section 90, chapter 605, Oregon Laws  2023, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2025, to be allocated to the Department of Education  for providing
stipends to licensed educators and classified school employees working in special  education
during the 2024-2025 school year, is decreased by $8,900,000.
SECTION 239. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 8 (1), chapter  475, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from lottery moneys
allocated from the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund to the Oregon
Business Development Department, for operations, is increased by $27,758, for administration
of tax incentive programs.
SECTION 240.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 8 (2), chapter  475, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from lottery moneys
allocated from the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund to the Oregon
Business Development Department, for business, innovation and trade, is  increased by
$267,151, for administration of tax incentive programs.
SECTION 241.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 4 (1), chapter 475,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery  funds or federal
funds, collected or  received by the Oregon Business Development Department, for oper-
ations, is increased by $18,505, for administration of tax incentive programs.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 29
SECTION 242. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 4 (2), chapter  475, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous  Receipts, but excluding lottery funds or federal
funds, collected or received by the Oregon  Business Development Department, for business,
innovation and trade, is increased by $64,768, for administration of tax incentive programs.
SECTION 243. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 8 (1), chapter  475, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from lottery moneys
allocated from the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund to the Oregon
Business Development Department, for operations, is  increased by $564,898, for administra-
tive expenses related to planning and execution  of the economic development management
information technology system.
SECTION 244.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 4 (1), chapter  475, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous  Receipts, but excluding lottery funds or federal
funds, collected or received by the Oregon Business Development Department,  for oper-
ations, is increased by $500,947, for administrative expenses related to planning and execution
of the economic development management information technology system.
SECTION 245. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to  the Emergency Board by section 292 (1), chapter 605, Oregon Laws 2023, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2025, to  be allocated to the Oregon Business Development De-
partment for the Oregon CHIPS Fund  established by section 6, chapter 25, Oregon Laws 2023,
is decreased by $50,000,000.
SECTION 246. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Oregon Business Development Department by section 8 (1), chapter 25,
Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June  30, 2025, for deposit into the Oregon CHIPS
Fund established by section 6, chapter 25, Oregon Laws 2023, is increased by $50,000,000.
SECTION 247. Notwithstanding any other provision of  law, the limitation on expenditures
established by section 8b, chapter  25, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June 30,
2025, as  the maximum limit for payment of expenses by the Oregon Business Development
Department from the Oregon CHIPS Fund  established under section 6, chapter 25, Oregon
Laws 2023, for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of sections 1 to 6 and 10, chapter
25, Oregon Laws 2023, is increased by $50,000,000, for program grants and  loans to businesses
applying for federal semiconductor financial assistance.
SECTION 248.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 8 (1), chapter  475, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from lottery moneys
allocated from the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund to the Oregon
Business Development Department, for operations, is  increased by $231,447, for administra-
tive expenses of the department related to human resources management.
SECTION 249.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 4 (1), chapter 475,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery  funds or federal
funds, collected or  received by the Oregon Business Development Department, for oper-
ations, is increased by $57,862, for administrative expenses  of the department related to hu-
man resources management.
SECTION 250. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Housing and Community Services Department by section 7, chapter  390,
Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium  ending June 30, 2025, to increase shelter capacity and
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 30
connections to shelter and to support rapid rehousing initiatives for communities in  desig-
nated homeless emergency areas based on  local plans submitted to the department, is in-
creased by $475,808, for  professional services to support emergency homelessness response
efforts.
SECTION 251. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$1,333,000 is established for the  biennium ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and  federal funds, collected or received by the Legislative Ad-
ministration Committee, for debt service.
SECTION 252. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Early Learning and Care by section  1 (1), chapter 448,
Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for  operations, is increased by
$1,437,041, for workload in the Child Care Licensing Division.
SECTION 253. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Education by section 2 (2), chapter 449, Oregon Laws  2023,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for other K-12 grant-in-aid  programs, is increased by
$1,012,500, for the Community Care Demonstration Project.
SECTION 254. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Education by section 2 (2), chapter 449, Oregon Laws  2023,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for other K-12 grant-in-aid  programs, is increased by
$660,000, for the Family Day Care Home sponsorship program.
SECTION 255. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (1), chapter 610, Oregon Laws
2023, for the biennium ending June  30, 2025, for central services, is increased by $7,808,548,
for the Office of Resilience and Emergency Management.
SECTION 256. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (1), chapter 610,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery,  Social Security Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section 2, chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by  the Depart-
ment of Human Services, for central services, is increased by $390,427 for the Office of
Resilience and Emergency Management.
SECTION 257.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3 (1), chapter 610,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30,  2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Department of Human Services, for  central services, is increased by
$4,815,271, for the Office of Resilience and Emergency Management.
SECTION 258. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (1), chapter 610, Oregon Laws
2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025,  for central services, is increased by $28,135,854,
for supplemental resources.
SECTION 259. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (1), chapter  610, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery, Social Security  Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section  2, chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by the Depart-
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 31
ment of Human Services, for central services, is increased  by $470,379, for supplemental re-
sources.
SECTION 260. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3 (1), chapter 610,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30,  2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Department of Human Services, for  central services, is increased by
$10,901,562, for supplemental resources.
SECTION 261. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (3), chapter 610, Oregon Laws
2023, for the biennium  ending June 30, 2025, for self-sufficiency programs, is decreased by
$967,071, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 262. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 3 (3), chapter  610, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 610,  Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Department of Human Services, for self-sufficiency programs,  is decreased
by $483,536, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 263. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (4), chapter 610, Oregon Laws
2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for  vocational rehabilitation services, is de-
creased by $41,460, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 264. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3 (4), chapter 610,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30,  2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Department  of Human Services, for vocational rehabilitation services, is de-
creased by $20,730, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 265. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (5), chapter 610, Oregon Laws
2023, for the biennium ending June  30, 2025, for child welfare programs, is decreased by
$8,373,534, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 266. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 3 (5), chapter  610, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 610,  Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Department of Human Services, for child welfare programs, is increased by
$785,703, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 267.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (6), chapter 610, Oregon Laws
2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025,  for aging and people with disabilities programs,
is decreased by $996,440, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 268. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3 (6), chapter 610,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30,  2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Department of Human Services, for aging and people  with disabilities pro-
grams, is decreased by $498,220, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 269. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (7), chapter 610, Oregon Laws
2023, for the  biennium ending June 30, 2025, for intellectual/developmental disabilities pro-
grams, is decreased by $1,381,979, for a budget realignment.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 32
SECTION 270. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 3 (7), chapter  610, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 610,  Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Department of Human Services, for intellectual/developmental disabilities
programs, is decreased by $690,990, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 271.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (8), chapter 610, Oregon Laws
2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for Oregon Eligibility Partnership,  is decreased
by $2,307,443, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 272. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 3 (8), chapter  610, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 610,  Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Department of Human Services, for Oregon Eligibility  Partnership, is de-
creased by $1,153,722, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 273. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (6), chapter 610, Oregon Laws
2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025,  for aging and people with disabilities programs,
is increased by $8,780,977, for Area Agency on Aging case management services.
SECTION 274. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3 (6), chapter 610,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30,  2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Department of Human Services, for aging and people  with disabilities pro-
grams, is increased by $8,780,975, for Area Agency on Aging case management services.
SECTION 275. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (6), chapter 610, Oregon Laws
2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025,  for aging and people with disabilities programs,
is increased by $783,944, for complaint investigations and  compliance reviews of assisted liv-
ing facilities and residential care facilities.
SECTION 276. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3 (6), chapter 610,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30,  2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Department of Human Services, for aging and people  with disabilities pro-
grams, is increased by $783,944, for complaint investigations and compliance reviews  of as-
sisted living facilities and residential care facilities.
NOTE: Section 277 was deleted. Subsequent sections were not renumbered.
SECTION 278. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (5), chapter 610,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery,  Social Security Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section 2, chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by  the Depart-
ment of Human Services, for  child welfare programs, is increased by $15,000,000, for tempo-
rary lodging prevention services.
SECTION 279. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (3), chapter 610, Oregon Laws
2023, for the biennium ending June  30, 2025, for self-sufficiency programs, is increased by
$96,236, for temporary assistance for domestic abuse survivors.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 33
SECTION 280. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3 (3), chapter 610,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30,  2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Department of Human Services, for  self-sufficiency programs, is increased
by $10,463,320, for temporary assistance for domestic abuse survivors.
SECTION 281. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (1), chapter 610, Oregon Laws
2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025,  for central services, is increased by $3,092, for
background check services.
SECTION 282. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (1), chapter  610, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery, Social Security  Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section  2, chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by the Depart-
ment of Human Services, for central services,  is increased by $737, for background check
services.
SECTION 283. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 3 (1), chapter  610, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 610,  Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Department of Human Services, for central services, is increased by  $2,672,
for background check services.
SECTION 284. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (2), chapter 610, Oregon Laws
2023, for the  biennium ending June 30, 2025, for state assessments and enterprise-wide costs,
is increased by $703,972, for background check services.
SECTION 285. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (2), chapter  610, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery, Social Security  Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section  2, chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by the Depart-
ment of Human Services, for state assessments and enterprise-wide costs, is increased by
$166,822, for background check services.
SECTION 286.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 3 (2), chapter  610, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 610,  Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Department of Human Services, for  state assessments and enterprise-wide
costs, is increased by $604,640, for background check services.
SECTION 287. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (8), chapter 610,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery,  Social Security Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section 2, chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by  the Depart-
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 34
ment of Human Services, for shared services, is increased by $1,511,515, for background
check services.
SECTION 288.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (7), chapter 610, Oregon Laws
2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for intellectual/developmental  disabilities pro-
grams, is increased by $579,732, for information technology system implementation.
SECTION 289. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3 (7), chapter 610,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30,  2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Department of Human Services, for intellectual/developmental disabilities
programs, is increased by $21,352,985, for information technology system implementation.
SECTION 290.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (3), chapter 610, Oregon Laws
2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for  self-sufficiency programs, is increased by
$11,984,958, for implementation of the summer electronic benefit transfer.
SECTION 291. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (3), chapter  610, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery, Social Security  Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section  2, chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by the Depart-
ment of Human Services, for self-sufficiency programs,  is increased by $149,247, for imple-
mentation of the summer electronic benefit transfer.
SECTION 292. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 3 (3), chapter  610, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 610,  Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Department of  Human Services, for self-sufficiency programs, is increased
by $82,506,435, for implementation of the summer electronic benefit transfer.
SECTION 293. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (3), chapter 610,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery,  Social Security Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section 2, chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by  the Depart-
ment of Human Services, for self-sufficiency programs, is increased by $99,000,000,  for em-
ployment related day care provider payments.
SECTION 294. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department  of Corrections by section 1 (4), chapter 377, Oregon Laws 2023,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for  community corrections, is increased by $620,000,
for the reimbursement to counties for the costs of incarcerated persons sentenced  under
felony driving under the influence of intoxicants.
SECTION 295. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Justice by section 1 (4), chapter 382, Oregon Laws 2023, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for the Crime Victim  and Survivor Services Division, is
increased by $750,000, for the Oregon Crime Victims Law Center.
SECTION 296. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Department of Emergency Management by section 10, chapter 15,
Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for the coordination of efforts to
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 35
address homelessness in designated homelessness emergency areas as part of  the activation
of the State of Oregon Emergency Operations Plan, is decreased by $475,808.
SECTION 297. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Oregon Youth Authority by section 1 (2), chapter 487, Oregon Laws 2023,
for the biennium ending  June 30, 2025, for community programs, is increased by $166,883, for
a Medicaid services support position.
SECTION 298. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3 (1), chapter 487,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds
collected or received by the Oregon Youth Authority, for community programs, is  increased
by $28,325, for a Medicaid services support position.
SECTION 299. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Judicial Department by section 1 (2),  chapter 380, Oregon Laws 2023, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for operations, is increased by $1,002,419,  for setting aside
and sealing criminal records under chapter 486, Oregon Laws 2021.
SECTION 300. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Judicial Department by section 1 (2),  chapter 380, Oregon Laws 2023, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for operations, is increased by $1,441,028,  for setting aside
and sealing eviction records under sections 64 to 66, chapter 13, Oregon Laws 2023.
SECTION 301. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Judicial Department by section 1 (1),  chapter 380, Oregon Laws 2023, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for judicial  compensation, is increased by $1,074,625, for
health benefit plans under ORS 238.538 for judges electing to retire  under ORS 238.535 (1)(b)
serving as pro tem judges.
SECTION 302. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (3), chapter 452,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, the proceeds of bonds for the Orphan  Site
Account and federal funds from congestion mitigation  and air quality grants, drinking water
protection, laboratory accreditation and woodstove grants and for  smoke monitoring labo-
ratory services but excluding lottery funds and federal funds  not described in section 2,
chapter 452, Oregon Laws  2023, collected or received by the Department of Environmental
Quality, for land quality, is increased by $1,666,000,  for the Fuel Tank Seismic Stability Pro-
gram.
SECTION 303. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department  of Environmental Quality by section 1 (3), chapter 452, Oregon
Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for  land quality, is increased by $1,450,000,
for legal services.
SECTION 304. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Education by section 1 (1), chapter 449, Oregon Laws  2023,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for operations, is increased by $1,688,595, for imple-
mentation of Transformative Social Emotional Learning standards.
SECTION 305.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (3), chapter 377,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected  or received by the Department of Corrections, for correctional services, is
increased by $961,454, for the expenditure of grant funds.
SECTION 306. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 10, chapter 605, Oregon Laws 2023,  for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses  by the Department of
Corrections from American  Rescue Plan Act Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund mon-
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 36
eys received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services and transferred to the
Department of Corrections for operations and health services, is increased by $90,177.
SECTION 307.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department  of Corrections by section 1 (1), chapter 377, Oregon Laws 2023,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for operations and health services, is decreased by
$90,177.
SECTION 308.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Judicial Department  by section 5, chapter 380, Oregon Laws 2023, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2025, for payment of expenses of  the Council on Court Procedures,
is increased by $7,500.
SECTION 309. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 8 (2), chapter 475,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for  payment of expenses from lottery moneys
allocated from the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund to the Oregon
Business Development Department  for business, innovation and trade, is increased by
$250,000, for global trade missions.
SECTION 310.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to  the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by section 1 (1), chapter 454,
Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium  ending June 30, 2025, for Higher Education Coordinating
Commission programs and operations, is decreased by $306,000, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 311. In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for the biennium ending June 30,
2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of  $126,000, for state support for public universi-
ties, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 312.
In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for the biennium ending June 30,
2025, out of the General Fund, the  amount of $180,000, for state support for community col-
leges, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 313.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (5), chapter 610, Oregon Laws
2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for child welfare  programs, is increased by
$1,800,000, for treatment foster care services.
SECTION 314. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Public Defense Services Commission by section 1 (4), chapter 481, Oregon
Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for  the Adult Trial Division, is increased
by $3,000,000, for contract attorneys.
SECTION 315. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (4), chapter 375,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 375, Oregon
Laws 2023, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for
the Chief Human Resources Office, is increased by $1,017,271, for the  ASCENT Leadership
Program.
SECTION 316.
In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the biennium ending  June
30, 2025, out of the General Fund,  the amount of $1,000,000, for distribution to the Willamette
Education Service District to fund regional career and technical education programs  pro-
vided by the Willamette Career Academy.
SECTION 317. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$6,797,590 is established for the  biennium ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Oregon  Department of Administrative Services from American
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 37
Rescue Plan Act Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys returned  to the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, for expenditures and activities to respond to the
COVID-19 public health emergency and its economic impacts.
SECTION 318.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 1 (6)(b)(B), chapter 457, Oregon  Laws 2023, for the
biennium ending June 30,  2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees,
moneys or other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and
federal funds, collected or received  by the Public Employees Retirement System, for the Core
Retirement System, for the ORION Modernization Project,  client relationship management,
is decreased by $855,000.
SECTION 319. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 1 (6)(b)(C), chapter  457, Oregon Laws 2023, for the
biennium ending June 30,  2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees,
moneys or other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and
federal funds, collected or received  by the Public Employees Retirement System, for the Core
Retirement System, for the ORION Modernization Project,  for data and analytics, is de-
creased by $300,000.
SECTION 320. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 1 (6)(b)(D), chapter 457, Oregon Laws  2023, for the
biennium ending June 30,  2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees,
moneys or other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and
federal funds, collected or received  by the Public Employees Retirement System, for the Core
Retirement System, for the ORION Modernization Project, for development  and operations,
is decreased by $542,000.
SECTION 321. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 1 (6)(b)(E), chapter 457, Oregon  Laws 2023, for the
biennium ending June 30,  2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees,
moneys or other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and
federal funds, collected or received  by the Public Employees Retirement System, for the Core
Retirement System,  for the ORION Modernization Project, for architecture, is increased by
$1,050,000.
SECTION 322. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 1 (6)(b)(F), chapter  457, Oregon Laws 2023, for the
biennium ending June 30,  2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees,
moneys or other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and
federal funds, collected or received  by the Public Employees Retirement System, for the Core
Retirement System, for the ORION Modernization Project, for independent quality manage-
ment services, is increased by $250,000.
SECTION 323.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 1 (6)(b)(G), chapter 457, Oregon Laws  2023, for the
biennium ending June 30,  2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees,
moneys or other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and
federal funds, collected or received  by the Public Employees Retirement System, for the Core
Retirement System,  for the ORION Modernization Project, for hybrid integration platform,
is increased by $50,000.
SECTION 324. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 1 (6)(b)(H), chapter 457, Oregon Laws  2023, for the
biennium ending June 30,  2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees,
moneys or other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and
federal funds, collected or received  by the Public Employees Retirement System, for the Core
Retirement System,  for the ORION Modernization Project, for telephony, is increased by
$347,000.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 38
SECTION 325. (1) In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is ap-
propriated to  the Emergency Board, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, out of the Gen-
eral Fund, the amount of $10,000,000, to be allocated  to the Department of Human Services,
for the Child Welfare Division, for temporary lodging prevention services.
(2) If  any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not allocated
by the Emergency Board  prior to December 1, 2024, the moneys remaining on that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
NOTE: Section 326 was deleted. Subsequent sections were not renumbered.
SECTION 327. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Long Term Care Ombudsman by section 1  (1), chapter 472, Oregon Laws
2023, for  the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for general program and services provided to
care facility residents, is increased by $80,456, for position compensation adjustments.
SECTION 328. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Military Department by  section 1 (1), chapter 360, Oregon Laws
2023, for the biennium ending  June 30, 2025, for administration, is increased by $214,204, for
an accounting manager.
SECTION 329. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Department of Emergency Management  by section 1 (1), chapter
357, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June  30, 2025, for administration, is in-
creased by $250,000, for an incident management software system.
SECTION 330. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Department  of Emergency Management by section 1 (1), chapter
357, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium  ending June 30, 2025, for administration, is in-
creased by $558,381, for a human resources unit.
SECTION 331. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of the State Fire Marshal, for the biennium ending June  30, 2025,
out of the General Fund, the amount of $4,000,000, for deposit into the  State Fire Marshal
Mobilization Fund established by ORS 476.565.
SECTION 332. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 167, chapter 605, Oregon  Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as  the maximum limit for payment of expenses by the Department of
the State Fire Marshal from the State Fire Marshal Mobilization Fund  established by ORS
476.565, for costs related to mobilizing local fire service  personnel, is increased by $4,000,000,
for wildfire mobilization, prepositioning and readiness response.
SECTION 333. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2, chapter 224, Oregon Laws  2023, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees,  moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,
collected or received by the Department of the State Fire Marshal, is  increased by $1,600,000,
for Community Risk Reduction Fund expenditures.
SECTION 334.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of the State Fire Marshal by section  1, chapter 224, Oregon
Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, is increased by $4,000,000,  for fire season
cash flow.
SECTION 335. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Commission on Judicial Fitness  and Disability by section 1 (1), chapter 381,
Oregon Laws 2023,  for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for administration, is decreased
by $16,646, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 336. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Commission on Judicial Fitness  and Disability by section 1 (2), chapter 381,
Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for extraordinary expenses, is in-
creased by $16,646, for a budget realignment.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 39
SECTION 337. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Public Defense Services Commission by section 1 (5),  chapter 481, Oregon
Laws 2023, for the  biennium ending June 30, 2025, for the Juvenile Trial Division, is decreased
by $3,481,261, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 338. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Public Defense Services Commission by section 1 (8),  chapter 481, Oregon
Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for the Parent Child Representation Pro-
gram, is decreased by $4,069,365, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 339. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Public Defense Services Commission by section 1 (10), chapter 481, Oregon
Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for the  Special Programs, Contracts and
Distributions Division, is decreased by $583,281, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 340. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of
$583,281 is established for the biennium ending June 30,  2025, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal  funds, collected or received by the Public Defense
Services Commission, for the Special  Programs, Contracts and Distributions Division, for a
budget realignment.
SECTION 341. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Public Defense Services Commission by section 1 (4), chapter 481, Oregon
Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for  the Adult Trial Division, is increased
by $8,133,907, for a budget realignment.
NOTE: Section 342 was deleted. Subsequent sections were not renumbered.
SECTION 343. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Public Defense Services Commission, for the biennium ending June  30, 2025,
out of the General Fund, the amount of $500,000,  for the Special Programs, Contracts and
Distributions Division, for the transition  of the Public Defense Services Commission to the
executive branch of government.
SECTION 344. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 4 (1), chapter 485,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and the Oregon War Veterans’ Bond  Sink-
ing Account, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by  the De-
partment of Veterans’ Affairs  for administration, grants and services supplied to veterans,
is increased by $1,736,682, for the Home Loan Servicing information technology project.
SECTION 345. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Bureau of Labor and Industries  by section 1, chapter 471, Oregon Laws
2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, is increased by $162,500, for the  Case Manage-
ment Software Project.
SECTION 346. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2, chapter  471, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees,  moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,
collected or received by the Bureau of Labor  and Industries, is increased by $48,050, for the
Case Management Software Project.
SECTION 347.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 3 (1), chapter  471, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of administrative expenses by the
Bureau of Labor and Industries from the  Wage Security Fund, is increased by $29,450, for
the Case Management Software Project.
SECTION 348. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 4, chapter  471, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium end-
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 40
ing June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds collected
or received by the  Bureau of Labor and Industries, is increased by $10,000, for the Case
Management Software Project.
SECTION 349. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Bureau of Labor and Industries  by section 1, chapter 471, Oregon Laws
2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, is increased by $98,000, for the purchase of public
records processing software.
SECTION 350. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2, chapter 471, Oregon Laws  2023, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees,  moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,
collected or  received by the Bureau of Labor and Industries, is increased by $991,772, for
registered apprenticeship compliance review.
SECTION 351.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 1, chapter 80, Oregon Laws 2023, for the  biennium ending
June 30, 2025, as  the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,
collected or received by the State Board of Licensed Social  Workers, is increased by $136,836,
for supplemental staffing.
SECTION 352.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Elliott State Research Forest Authority by section 1, chapter 463,  Oregon
Laws 2023, for  the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for biennial expenses, is decreased by
$4,002,152.
SECTION 353. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 4, chapter  451, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds collected
or received by the State Department of Energy, is increased by $1,941,990, for the Energy
Efficiency and Conservation Grant.
SECTION 354.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2, chapter 451, Oregon Laws  2023, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees,  moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,
collected or received by the State Department of Energy, is increased by $580,752,  for finan-
cial oversight.
SECTION 355.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State Department of Energy by section  1 (1), chapter 451, Oregon Laws
2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for energy development services, is increased
by $43,516, for position reclassification.
SECTION 356.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department  of Environmental Quality by section 1 (2), chapter 452, Oregon
Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for water quality,  is increased by $275,625,
for administrative costs.
SECTION 357. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department  of Environmental Quality by section 1 (4), chapter 452, Oregon
Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for agency management, is increased  by
$50,000, for the Environmental Justice Council.
SECTION 358. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of State Lands, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, out  of the
General Fund, the amount  of $4,002,152, for the Elliott State Research Forest, for operational
costs.
SECTION 359. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 8 (1), chapter 603,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 41
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds
collected or  received by the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board, for operations, is de-
creased by $576,000, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 360. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 6, chapter 603, Oregon Laws  2023, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses by the Oregon Watershed
Enhancement Board from lottery moneys deposited into the Watershed  Conservation Oper-
ating Fund established under ORS 541.945, for operating expenses, activities and projects  to
implement Article XV, section 4b, of the Oregon Constitution, is increased  by $576,000, for
a budget realignment.
SECTION 361. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of Transportation, for the biennium ending June  30, 2025, out of
the General Fund, the amount of $20,000,000, for the maintenance program, for right of way
health and safety.
SECTION 362. In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of  Transportation, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, out of
the General Fund,  the amount of $19,000,000, for the maintenance program, for essential
highway maintenance and operations.
SECTION 363. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (4), chapter 363,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received  as reimburse-
ment from the United States Department of Transportation, but  excluding lottery funds and
federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 363, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received
by the Department of  Transportation, for the local government program, is decreased by
$4,600,000, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 364. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (8), chapter  363, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received as reimburse-
ment from the United States Department of Transportation, but  excluding lottery funds and
federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 363, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received
by the Department of Transportation, for policy,  data and analysis, is increased by $4,600,000,
for a budget realignment.
SECTION 365. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (5), chapter  363, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received as reimburse-
ment from the United States Department of Transportation, but  excluding lottery funds and
federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 363, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received
by the Department of Transportation, for driver and  motor vehicle services, is increased by
$4,244,441, for Real ID transactions.
SECTION 366. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Commission on Indian Services by section 17, chapter 383, Oregon  Laws
2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, is  increased by $55,000, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 367. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Legislative Administration Committee by section 1 (1), chapter 383, Oregon
Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for the  general program, is decreased by
$55,000, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 368. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1 (1), chapter  591, Oregon Laws 2023,
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 42
for the biennium ending June 30, 2025,  for Health Systems Division -Administration, is de-
creased by $19,463,461, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 369. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1 (2), chapter  591, Oregon Laws 2023,
for the biennium  ending June 30, 2025, for Health Systems Division - Programs, is increased
by $1,195,062, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 370. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon  Health Authority by section 1 (3), chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for health policy and  analytics, is decreased by
$16,721,529, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 371. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1 (4), chapter  591, Oregon Laws 2023,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for  public health, is increased by $373,069, for a budget
realignment.
SECTION 372. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1 (5), chapter  591, Oregon Laws 2023,
for the biennium ending  June 30, 2025, for Oregon State Hospital, is decreased by $745,559,
for a budget realignment.
SECTION 373. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon  Health Authority by section 1 (6), chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023,
for the biennium ending June  30, 2025, for central services, is decreased by $127,619, for a
budget realignment.
SECTION 374. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1 (7), chapter  591, Oregon Laws 2023,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for state assessments and enterprise-wide  costs, is
increased by $2,912,278, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 375. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 3 (4), chapter  591, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from lottery moneys
allocated from the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund to the Oregon
Health Authority, for central services, is increased by $204,376, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 376.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 3 (5), chapter  591, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from lottery moneys
allocated from the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund to the Oregon
Health Authority, for state  assessments and enterprise-wide costs, is decreased by $204,376,
for a budget realignment.
SECTION 377.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (1), chapter 591,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax receipts, marijuana tax re-
ceipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and Medicare receipts, but excluding  lot-
tery funds and  federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023,
collected or received by  the Oregon Health Authority, for Health Systems Division - Admin-
istration, is increased by $22,905,255, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 378. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (2), chapter  591, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax receipts, marijuana  tax re-
ceipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and Medicare receipts, but excluding lot-
tery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 591, Oregon  Laws 2023,
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 43
collected or received  by the Oregon Health Authority, for Health Systems Division - Pro-
grams, is increased by $87,257,056, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 379. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (3), chapter 591,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax receipts, marijuana tax re-
ceipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and Medicare receipts, but excluding  lot-
tery funds and  federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023,
collected or received by the Oregon Health Authority, for health  policy and analytics, is de-
creased by $6,590,467, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 380. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (5), chapter  591, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax receipts, marijuana  tax re-
ceipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and Medicare receipts, but excluding lot-
tery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 591, Oregon  Laws 2023,
collected or received by the Oregon Health Authority, for public health, is increased  by
$13,413,773, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 381. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (6), chapter 591,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax receipts, marijuana tax re-
ceipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and Medicare receipts, but excluding  lot-
tery funds and  federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023,
collected or received by the Oregon Health  Authority, for drug treatment and recovery ser-
vices, is decreased by $5,785,529, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 382. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (8), chapter  591, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax receipts, marijuana  tax re-
ceipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and Medicare receipts, but excluding lot-
tery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 591, Oregon  Laws 2023,
collected or received by the Oregon Health Authority,  for central services, is increased by
$128,555, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 383. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (9), chapter 591,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax receipts, marijuana tax re-
ceipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and Medicare receipts, but excluding  lot-
tery funds and  federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023,
collected or  received by the Oregon Health Authority, for state assessments and enterprise-
wide costs, is increased by $202,905, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 384. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section  2 (10), chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax receipts, marijuana  tax re-
ceipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and Medicare receipts, but excluding lot-
tery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 591, Oregon  Laws 2023,
collected or received by the  Oregon Health Authority, for shared administrative services, is
increased by $762,839, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 385. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (11), chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023,  for the biennium
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 44
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax receipts, marijuana tax re-
ceipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and Medicare receipts, but excluding  lot-
tery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 591, Oregon  Laws 2023,
collected or received by the Oregon  Health Authority, for capital improvement, is increased
by $1,398,369, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 386. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 5 (1), chapter 591,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30,  2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Oregon Health  Authority, for Health Services Division - Administration, is
decreased by $4,379,499, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 387. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 5 (2), chapter  591, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 591,  Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Oregon Health Authority, for Health Services Division - Programs, is  de-
creased by $320,859,303, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 388. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 5 (3), chapter 591,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30,  2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Oregon Health  Authority, for health policy and analytics, is increased by
$732,278, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 389. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 5 (4), chapter  591, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 591,  Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Oregon Health Authority, for public health, is increased by $55,469,794, for a
budget realignment.
SECTION 390.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 5 (6), chapter  591, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 591,  Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Oregon Health Authority, for central services, is increased by $5,197,007, for
a budget realignment.
SECTION 391.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 5 (7), chapter  591, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 591,  Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Oregon Health Authority, for state assessments  and enterprise-wide costs,
is increased by $1,115,041, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 392. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (3), chapter 610, Oregon Laws
2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for self-sufficiency programs,  is decreased by
$2,500,000.
SECTION 393. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Justice by section 1 (4), chapter 382, Oregon Laws 2023, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2025,  for the Crime Victim and Survivor Services Division, is
increased by $400,000, for the Attorney General’s Sexual Assault Task Force.
NOTE: Section 394 was deleted. Subsequent sections were not renumbered.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 45
SECTION 395. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (1), chapter 482,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the Department  of Public Safety Standards and Training, for
operations, is increased by $1,800,778, for position compensation adjustments.
SECTION 396. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Judicial Department by  section 1 (2), chapter 380, Oregon Laws 2023, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2025,  for operations, is increased by $3,200,000, for position
compensation adjustments.
SECTION 397. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Public Defense Services Commission by section 1 (1),  chapter 481, Oregon
Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for  the Executive Division, is decreased
by $127,212, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 398. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Public Defense Services Commission by section 1 (2), chapter 481, Oregon
Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for the Compliance, Audit and Performance
Division, is decreased by $652,115, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 399. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Public Defense Services Commission by section 1 (3), chapter 481, Oregon
Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for the Appellate  Division, is decreased by
$247,007, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 400. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Public Defense Services Commission by section 1 (4), chapter 481, Oregon
Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for the Adult Trial Division, is  decreased
by $1,642,758, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 401. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Public Defense Services Commission by section 1 (6),  chapter 481, Oregon
Laws 2023, for  the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for Preauthorized Expenses, is decreased
by $3,850,825, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 402. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Public Defense Services Commission by section 1 (7), chapter 481, Oregon
Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for  Court Mandated Expenses, is decreased
by $3,156,746, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 403. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Public Defense Services Commission by section 1 (8), chapter 481, Oregon
Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for the Parent Child Representation  Pro-
gram, is decreased by $2,193,743, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 404. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Public Defense Services Commission by section 1 (10), chapter 481, Oregon
Laws 2023, for the biennium  ending June 30, 2025, for the Special Programs, Contracts and
Distributions Division, is decreased by $98,369, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 405. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 1 (1), chapter 379,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for  payment from fees, moneys or other reven-
ues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and moneys  appropriated to the Employment Depart-
ment by sections 2 and 3, chapter 379, Oregon Laws 2023, but excluding lottery funds and
federal funds other than  those described in section 2, chapter 379, Oregon Laws 2023, for
unemployment insurance, shared services, workforce operations,  contributions and recovery,
and workforce and economic  research, is increased by $10,359,627, for unemployment insur-
ance administration.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 46
SECTION 406. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Land Conservation and  Development by section 1 (1),
chapter 455, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June  30, 2025, for the planning pro-
gram, is increased by $1,258,872, for higher than anticipated legal expenses and  realignment
of position costs.
SECTION 407. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State  Department of Fish and Wildlife by section 1 (1), chapter 590, Oregon
Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for the  Fish Division, is increased by
$282,735, for Klamath River fish reintroduction.
SECTION 408. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the State Department of Agriculture, for the  biennium ending June 30, 2025, out
of the General Fund, the amount of $1,250,000, for grasshopper suppression efforts.
SECTION 409. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the  Water Resources Department, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, out of
the General  Fund, the amount of $1,000,000, to be deposited into the Water Well Abandon-
ment, Repair and Replacement  Fund established by ORS 537.766 for the purpose of carrying
out the program described in ORS 537.767.
SECTION 410. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3 (4), chapter 460,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and including  federal funds received under
cooperative agreements with or contracts from  the Bureau of Reclamation of the United
States Department of the Interior, the United  States Army Corps of Engineers, the United
States Geological Survey, the Bonneville Power Administration and the  National Fish and
Wildlife Foundation, but excluding lottery funds and  federal funds not described in section
3, chapter 460,  Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by the Water Resources Department,
for technical services, is increased by $1,000,000,  for authorized expenditures of moneys de-
posited in the Water Well Abandonment, Repair and Replacement Fund established by  ORS
537.766.
SECTION 411. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Office of the Governor by section 1, chapter 358,  Oregon Laws 2023, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2025, is increased by $30,000, to support the Task Force on
Tribal Consultation.
SECTION 412.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Emergency Board by section 12, chapter 380, Oregon Laws 2023, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2025, to be  allocated to the Judicial Department for mandated
payments or third-party collections, is decreased by $1,163,993.
SECTION 413. (1) In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is ap-
propriated to  the Emergency Board, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, out of the Gen-
eral Fund, the amount of $5,000,000, to be allocated to the Oregon Department of Emergency
Management for a disaster preparedness stockpile.
(2) If  any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not allocated
by the Emergency Board  prior to December 1, 2024, the moneys remaining on that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
SECTION 414. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to  the Emergency Board by section 278 (1), chapter 605, Oregon Laws 2023, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2025, to be allocated to the Department  of State Police for is-
sues related to firearm background checks, is decreased by $7,593,100.
SECTION 415. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Emergency Board by section 152 (1), chapter 605, Oregon Laws  2023, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2025, to be  allocated for the state’s natural disaster prevention,
preparedness, response and recovery, is decreased by $15,000,000.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 47
SECTION 416. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Education by section 1 (1), chapter 449, Oregon Laws  2023,
for the biennium ending June  30, 2025, for operations, is increased by $186,255, for business
analysis of the State School Fund Modernization Project.
SECTION 417. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Education by section  1, chapter 450, Oregon Laws 2023, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for the State School Fund, is decreased by $115,928,470.
SECTION 418. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2, chapter  450, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2025, as the  maximum limit for payment of expenses from lottery moneys allo-
cated from the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund  to the Department of
Education for the State School Fund, is increased by $34,611,890.
SECTION 419. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 4, chapter  450, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses by the Department of Ed-
ucation from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous  Receipts, but
excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the department  for the
State School Fund from the Fund for Student Success established under ORS 327.001, is in-
creased by $81,316,580.
SECTION 420.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to  the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by section 1 (9), chapter 454,
Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June  30, 2025, for public university statewide
programs, is increased by $500,000, for distribution to Portland State University to  support
the operations of the Center for Women’s Leadership.
SECTION 421. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to  the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by section 1 (9), chapter 454,
Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June  30, 2025, for public university statewide
programs, is increased by $1,000,000, for distribution to the University of Oregon Just  Fu-
tures Institute to conduct research to understand and address water needs of environmental
justice communities and to award grants.
SECTION 422.
In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium  ending June 30, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $250,000, for public  health, to address program costs when fees
are waived under ORS 433.285.
SECTION 423. In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the biennium ending  June
30, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $100,000,  for distribution to the Civil Air
Patrol U.S. Airforce Auxiliary Oregon Wing to support operations.
SECTION 424. In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the biennium ending  June
30, 2025, out of the General Fund, the  amount of $2,500,000, for distribution to Greater
Portland Inc for a marketing strategy to  attract businesses and generate investment for
Oregon.
SECTION 425. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the biennium ending  June
30, 2025, out of  the General Fund, the amount of $375,000, for distribution to Special Olympics
Oregon for sports training and athletic competition.
SECTION 426. In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the biennium ending  June
30, 2025, out of the General Fund, the  amount of $1,250,000, for distribution to Northwest
Health Foundation II for comprehensive data collection and research on the lived experiences
and social determinants of health of minority populations, based  on sexual orientation and
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 48
gender identity, and Oregon state agencies’ policies and  investments impacting these popu-
lations.
SECTION 427. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the biennium ending  June
30, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of  $1,000,000, for distribution to the Oregon
Historical Society to support operations.
NOTE: Section 428 was deleted. Subsequent sections were not renumbered.
SECTION 429. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (2), chapter 591,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax receipts, marijuana tax re-
ceipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and Medicare receipts, but excluding  lot-
tery funds and  federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023,
collected or received by the Oregon Health Authority, for Health Systems Division  - Pro-
grams, is increased by $38,200,000, for the distribution of payments to hospitals  under the
Disproportionate Share Hospital program.
SECTION 430. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 5 (2), chapter 591,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30,  2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Oregon Health Authority, for  Health Services Division - Programs, is in-
creased by $54,600,000, for the distribution of payments to hospitals  under the Dispropor-
tionate Share Hospital program.
SECTION 431. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (10), chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023,  for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax receipts, marijuana tax re-
ceipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and Medicare receipts, but excluding  lot-
tery funds and  federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023,
collected or received by the Oregon Health Authority, for  shared administrative services, is
increased by $1,644,492,  for costs related to the implementation of a Summer Electronic
Benefits Transfer program.
SECTION 432. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (3), chapter 610, Oregon Laws
2023, for the biennium ending June  30, 2025, for self-sufficiency programs, is increased by
$2,000,000, for newcomer support services.
SECTION 433. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 138, chapter 605, Oregon  Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025,  as the maximum limit for payment of expenses by the Judicial De-
partment from the Oregon Courthouse Capital Construction and Improvement  Fund estab-
lished by section 64, chapter 723, Oregon Laws 2013, for the cost of issuing general  obligation
bonds, is increased by $242,001.
SECTION 434. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 139, chapter 605, Oregon  Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025,  as the maximum limit for payment of expenses by the Judicial De-
partment from the Oregon Courthouse Capital Construction and Improvement  Fund estab-
lished by section 64, chapter 723, Oregon Laws 2013, for the project costs for  the Benton
County Courthouse, is increased by $6,902,999.
SECTION 435. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 140, chapter  605, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses by  the Judicial De-
partment from the  Oregon Courthouse Capital Construction and Improvement Fund estab-
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 49
lished by section 64, chapter 723, Oregon Laws 2013, for local matching funds  for the project
costs for the Benton County Courthouse, is increased by $6,902,999.
SECTION 436. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 141, chapter 605, Oregon  Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025,  as the maximum limit for payment of expenses by the Judicial De-
partment from the Oregon Courthouse Capital Construction and Improvement  Fund estab-
lished by section  64, chapter 723, Oregon Laws 2013, for the project costs for the Clackamas
County Courthouse, is increased by $15,000,000.
SECTION 437. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 142, chapter  605, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses by  the Judicial De-
partment from the  Oregon Courthouse Capital Construction and Improvement Fund estab-
lished by section 64, chapter 723, Oregon Laws 2013, for local matching funds  for the project
costs for the Clackamas County Courthouse, is increased by $15,000,000.
SECTION 438. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Public Defense Services Commission by section 1 (4), chapter 481, Oregon
Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for  the Adult Trial Division, is increased
by $3,147,289, for regional state employee pilot programs for trial-level defense  to address
unrepresented persons.
SECTION 439. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Public Defense Services Commission by section 1 (4), chapter 481, Oregon
Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for  the Adult Trial Division, is increased
by $157,253, for the Temporary Hourly Increase Program.
SECTION 440. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Public Defense Services Commission by section 1 (2),  chapter 481, Oregon
Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for the Compliance, Audit and Performance
Division, is increased by $130,460, for attorney training and certifications.
SECTION 441. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State Department of Agriculture by section 1  (3), chapter 350, Oregon
Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for natural resources, is increased by
$250,000, for deposit in the Invasive Species Council Account established under ORS 570.800,
for invasive species outreach and education.
SECTION 442.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (3), chapter 350,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, and  including federal funds for contract
services, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 350,
Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by the State  Department of Agriculture, for natural
resources, is increased  by $250,000, for expenditures from the Invasive Species Council Ac-
count established under ORS 570.800.
SECTION 443.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State  Department of Agriculture by section 1 (3), chapter 350, Oregon
Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for natural resources, is increased by
$750,000, for deposit in the Invasive Species Control Account  established under ORS 570.810,
for activities to mitigate the negative impacts of invasive species.
SECTION 444.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (3), chapter  350, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, and  including federal funds for contract
services, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 350,
Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by the State  Department of Agriculture, for natural
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 50
resources, is increased by $750,000, for expenditures from the Invasive Species Control  Ac-
count established under ORS 570.810.
SECTION 445. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State  Department of Fish and Wildlife by section 1 (2), chapter 590, Oregon
Laws 2023, for the  biennium ending June 30, 2025, for the Wildlife Division, is increased by
$795,000, for activities to detect chronic wasting disease and other zoonotic diseases.
SECTION 446. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section  12, chapter 449, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as  the maximum limit for payment of expenses by the Department of
Education for a  transfer of corporate activities tax funds from the Early Learning Account
established under  ORS 327.269 to the Department of Early Learning and Care, is increased
by $5,323,379, to fund budgeted expenditures.
SECTION 447. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 10, chapter 449, Oregon Laws 2023,  for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payments of grants-in-aid, program costs and
purchased services by the Department of Education from the Student Investment  Account
established under ORS 327.175, is increased by $4,882,252.
SECTION 448. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department  of Early Learning and Care by section 1 (2), chapter 448,
Oregon Laws  2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for Early Learning Programs, is
increased by $1,500,000, for granting funds to the Provider Services Fund.
SECTION 449. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 4 (2), chapter  448, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses  for operations, grants-
in-aid, program costs and purchased services  by the Department of Early Learning and Care
from corporate activity tax funds transferred from the Early  Learning Account by the De-
partment of Education, for early learning programs, is increased by $5,000,000, for  the
Oregon Prenatal to Kindergarten Program.
SECTION 450. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department  of Early Learning and Care by section 1 (2), chapter 448,
Oregon Laws  2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for Early Learning Programs, is
decreased by $5,000,000, for the Oregon Prenatal to Kindergarten Program.
SECTION 451. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Justice by section 1 (3), chapter 382, Oregon Laws 2023, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for the Criminal Justice Division,  is increased by
$1,975,376, for assistance to district attorneys  and enforcement activities under the
Racketeer Influenced and Corrupt Organizations Act against drug trafficking organizations.
SECTION 452. Section 275, chapter 605, Oregon Laws 2023, is repealed.
SECTION 453. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Long Term Care Ombudsman by section 1  (2), chapter 472, Oregon Laws
2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for the  public guardian and conservator pro-
gram, is increased by $904,102, for services to individuals with complex needs  discharging
from hospitals to post-acute care settings.
SECTION 454. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Justice by section 1 (4), chapter 382, Oregon Laws 2023, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2025,  for the Crime Victim and Survivor Services Division, is
increased by $2,000,000, for the Survivor Housing Funds Grant Program.
SECTION 455. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Justice by section 1 (4), chapter 382, Oregon Laws 2023, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2025,  for the Crime Victim and Survivor Services Division, is
increased by $2,000,000, for deposit in the Oregon Domestic and  Sexual Violence Services
Fund established by ORS 147.453, to assist victims of domestic violence or sexual assault.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 51
SECTION 456. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 18, chapter 605, Oregon Laws 2023,  for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the Department of Justice, for  the crime victims and survivor
services division, and the Oregon Domestic and Sexual Violence Services Fund established
by ORS 147.453, to assist victims of domestic  violence or sexual assault with emergency
shelter and safety  planning, is increased by $2,000,000, to assist victims of domestic violence
or sexual assault.
SECTION 457.
In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025,
out of the General Fund,  the amount of $5,161,000, for deposit in the Oregon Agricultural
Heritage Fund established under ORS 541.978, for the purposes described in ORS 541.979.
SECTION 458. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 7 (1), chapter  603, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the Oregon Watershed Enhancement  Board, for operations,
is increased by $619,320, for the purposes described in ORS 541.979.
SECTION 459. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 7 (2), chapter 603,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected  or received by the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board, for grants, is
increased by $4,541,680, for the purposes described in ORS 541.979.
SECTION 460. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Emergency Board by section 7 (1), chapter 605, Oregon  Laws 2023, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2025,  to be allocated for expenses related to nonunanimous jury
convictions, is decreased by $1,000,000.
SECTION 461. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Emergency Board by section 3 (1), chapter 481, Oregon  Laws 2023, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2025, to be allocated to  the Public Defense Services Commission for
Adult Trial Division or Juvenile  Trial Division caseload costs the commission is unable to
mitigate during the interim legislative periods, is decreased by $3,000,000.
SECTION 462. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Legislative Administration Committee by section 1 (1), chapter 383, Oregon
Laws 2023, for the biennium ending  June 30, 2025, for the general program, is decreased by
$3,009,501.
SECTION 463. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Legislative Assembly by section 6, chapter 383, Oregon Laws 2023, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2025, for biennial office expenses, is decreased by $3,270,556.
SECTION 464.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Legislative  Assembly by section 7 (1), chapter 383, Oregon Laws 2023, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for payment  of the expenses of members of the Eighty-
second Legislative Assembly, is decreased by $175,207.
SECTION 465. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Legislative Assembly by section 7 (2), chapter 383,  Oregon Laws 2023, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for payment of  the expenses of members of the Eighty-
third Legislative Assembly, is decreased by $3,453,718.
SECTION 466. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Legislative Assembly by section 8, chapter 383, Oregon Laws 2023, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2025, for the Legislative Equity Office, is decreased by $1,659,877.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 52
SECTION 467. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Legislative Counsel Committee by section 11, chapter  383, Oregon Laws
2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, is decreased by $1,498,332.
SECTION 468. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Legislative  Fiscal Officer by section 14 (1), chapter 383, Oregon Laws 2023,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, is decreased by $1,569,815.
SECTION 469. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Legislative Policy and  Research Committee by section 15, chapter 383,
Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, is decreased by $362,994.
SECTION 470. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 8 (1), chapter  454, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds and funds described in  sections 12 to 16, chapter 454, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for Higher Education Coordi-
nating Commission programs and related grants, is increased by  $115,000, for costs of bond
issuance.
SECTION 471.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1 (2), chapter  591, Oregon Laws 2023,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for Health Systems Division -  Programs, is decreased
by $2,055,976.
SECTION 472. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 5 (2), chapter 591,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30,  2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by  the Oregon Health Authority, for Health Services Division - Programs, is de-
creased by $1,064,016.
SECTION 473. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon  Health Authority by section 1 (1), chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023,
for the biennium  ending June 30, 2025, for Health Systems Division -Administration, is in-
creased by $2,055,976, for carrying out the provisions  of chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2024 (En-
rolled House Bill 4002).
SECTION 474. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 5 (1), chapter  591, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 591,  Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Oregon Health Authority, for Health Services  Division - Administration, is
increased by $1,064,016, for carrying out the  provisions of chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2024
(Enrolled House Bill 4002).
SECTION 475. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of
$5,095,000 is established for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, as  the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal  funds, collected or received by the Oregon Depart-
ment of Emergency Management, for the State Preparedness and Incident Response Equip-
ment Grant program.
SECTION 476.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (1), chapter  487, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the Oregon Youth Authority, for facility programs,  is in-
creased by $180,000 for the costs of bonds issuance.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 53
SECTION 477. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 88 (7), chapter 605, Oregon Laws 2023,  for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the  maximum limit for payment of expenses from proceeds of lottery
bonds, collected or received  by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the
provision of a grant to the Latino Network, is decreased by $4,051,914.
SECTION 478. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 88 (13), chapter 605, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the  maximum limit for payment of expenses from proceeds of lottery
bonds, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative  Services, for the
provision of a grant to the Eugene Civic Alliance, is decreased by $5,060,949.
SECTION 479.
In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there are ap-
propriated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the  biennium ending
June 30, 2025, out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for distribution to the  fol-
lowing entities, for the following purposes:
(1) $5,000,000 to the Eugene Civic Alliance for the Eugene Civic Park Stadium project.
(2) $4,000,000 to the Latino Network for the La  Plaza Esperanza service hub for Portland
and Gresham residents.
(3) $2,500,000 to the Oregon Vietnamese  American Cultural Center to support the acqui-
sition and development of a community center.
(4) $3,000,000 to Round-Up City Development Corporation to support the construction of
the Pendleton Regional Sports Complex.
(5) $3,000,000 to Willamette University for artificial turf and lights at Roy S. “Spec”
Keene Stadium at Bush Park to support Salem youth baseball and softball.
(6) $3,605,000 to Clackamas County Children’s Commission for the Milwaukie  Head Start
Center.
(7) $2,500,000 to the Emergency Communications of Southern Oregon  for the Radio
Infrastructure Build-Out and Modernization project.
(8) $2,000,000 to Nehalem Bay Health District for the Nehalem Bay Health and Senior
Care Improvement project.
(9) $2,000,000 to Homeless Solutions Coalition of Clackamas County, Inc.  for the Oregon
City Resource Center.
(10) $1,500,000 to Portland Japanese Garden for The Japan Institute at Portland Japanese
Garden.
(11) $400,000 to the Vietnam War Memorial Fund for  the Vietnam War Memorial on the
Oregon State Capitol grounds.
(12) $1,437,058 to the Clackamas County Children’s Commission for the Marylhurst Center
for Children and Families.
(13) $1,000,000 to the City of Junction City for the Alderdale Well project.
(14) $1,317,217 to Samaritan Pacific Health  Services, Inc. to support the Lincoln County
Residential Substance Use Disorder Treatment Facility.
(15) $900,000 to Lane County for emergency communications equipment.
(16) $500,000 to the City of Gresham Fire Department  to support the replacement of the
training tower at Gresham Fire and Emergency Services Station 74.
(17) $190,000 to La Pine Rural Fire Protection District for EMS rescue equipment.
(18) $750,000 to Center for Hope & Safety for the HOPE Plaza project.
(19) $1,500,000 to Homes for Good Housing Agency for the Ollie Court  Housing Project
(formerly Naval Reserve Housing and Early Learning Center Project).
(20) $1,000,000 to Mid-Willamette Family YMCA for Linn County YMCA Veterans Hous-
ing.
(21) $750,000 to Wonderfolk for The Kidz Outside for the  George Park lighting and walk-
way improvement project.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 54
(22) $2,500,000 to Benton County  for housing units as part of the county’s coordinated
response to housing and homelessness.
SECTION 480. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services by section 36  (18), chapter
___, Oregon Laws 2024 (Enrolled House Bill 5204), for the biennium ending  June 30, 2025, for
distribution to Multnomah County to support the construction of a behavioral health drop-off
center, is increased by $15,000,000.
SECTION 481. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the following
amounts are established for the biennium  ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limits for
payment of  expenses from proceeds of lottery bonds, collected or received by the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, for the provision of grants to the following entities
for the following purposes:
(1) $7,614,676 to Lane County for construction of the Fairgrounds Multi-Use Facility.
(2) $15,196,461 to the City of Hillsboro for the Hillsboro Hops Ballpark.
(3) $4,052,940 to the Parrott Creek Child and Family Services for construction  of a youth
residential treatment campus in Clackamas County.
(4) $3,046,891 to the Family YMCA of Marion and Polk Counties for the development of
a centralized social service and resource center that includes affordable housing  and
workforce development in Salem.
SECTION 482.
 Section 159, chapter 605, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 159.  Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  expenditures
established by section 2 (4), chapter 363, Oregon  Laws 2023, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023,
as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  fees, moneys or other revenues, including Mis-
cellaneous Receipts and federal funds received  as reimbursement from the United States Department
of Transportation, but excluding lottery funds  and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter
363, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by the Department of Transportation, for the  local
government program, is increased by $20,000,000, for distribution to the  [ Port of Hood River ] Hood
River-White Salmon Bridge  Authority  for the Hood River-White Salmon Interstate Bridge project.
SECTION 483. Section 87, chapter 605, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 87.  In addition to  and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropriated to the
Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the biennium beginning July 1,  2023, out of the
General Fund, the following amounts for the following purposes:
(1) Oregon Community Food System Network for grants for small-scale farms  and ranches:
$2,650,000.
(2) Oregon Association of Water Utilities (OAWU) to build the Water System Training  Center:
$1,600,000.
(3) Oregon Community Food System  Network to develop food hubs and regional food system
infrastructure: $1,500,000.
(4) Baker County for infrastructure improvement projects (water, sewer, road, broadband):
$2,250,000.
(5) City of Philomath for  Philomath Frolic and Rodeo (Skirvin Park) stands replacement and
lighting upgrade: $1,900,000.
(6) Polk County for the Polk County Mental Health Treatment/Crisis Center: $2,000,000.
(7) City of La Pine for the La Pine Incubator/Spec. Building Project: $1,500,000.
(8) City of Depoe Bay for the Depoe Bay docks and pilings restoration project: $1,500,000.
(9) City of  Salem for the renovations of ARCHES and Wallace Early Learning Center sheltering
service:  $1,850,000.
(10) La Clinica for La Clinica Acute Care Clinic expansion: $2,200,000.
(11) Vietnam War Memorial Fund for the Vietnam War Memorial on the Oregon State Capitol
Grounds: $1,000,000.
(12) Oregon Center for Creative Learning for the Oregon  Center for Creative Learning expan-
sion: $2,000,000.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 55
(13) City of Springfield for the Mill Street reconstruction: $2,000,000.
(14) Klamath County for construction of the Klamath Crimson Rose facility: $2,000,000.
(15) Gresham-Barlow School District for a school-based health center: $1,500,000.
(16) Children’s Cancer  Therapy Development Institute for children’s cancer research
expansion/equipment: $1,000,000.
(17) Native American Youth & Family Center for NAYA campus improvements and  building
remodel: $1,150,000.
(18) Row River  Fire Response for [ emergency communication equipment ] fire and emergency
responder communications, personal protective  and emergency medical equipment and
training and certification costs related to the new equipment : $143,000.
(19) Boring, Oregon Foundation to purchase property for a community center: $850,000.
(20) Wildflower Preschool & Child Care  LLC for a new child care facility in Myrtle Creek:
$800,000.
(21) East Salem Community Center for the El Campo Community Soccer Field: $450,000.
(22) City of Milwaukie for the Johnson Creek Solar Project: $375,000.
(23) City of Sheridan for homeless community shelters: $225,000.
(24) Boys & Girls Club of Western Treasure Valley for revitalizing and enhancing  the safety of
the clubhouse: $100,000.
(25) Kellogg Rural Fire District for the construction of a main fire station: $1,200,000.
(26) North Douglas County Fire & EMS to purchase  property and to build student and volunteer
housing for fire station: $800,000.
(27) East Salem Community Center for HVAC replacement: $175,000.
(28) The Dalles Civic Auditorium for sound and lighting for theatre: $50,000.
(29) Every Child Linn Benton (ECLB) for ECLB programs  to mobilize community to uplift chil-
dren and families impacted by foster care: $250,000.
(30) Community Action Program of East Central  Oregon (CAPECO) to build food bank center:
$1,250,000.
(31) FOOD for Lane County to purchase land for Food Farm: $1,150,000.
(32) Marion Polk Food Share for mobile pantries: $1,025,000.
(33) Oregon Food Bank for warehouse expansion and  renovation at multiple locations:
$3,020,000.
(34) ACCESS, Inc. of Medford for food bank warehouse expansion: $800,000.
(35) Community Connection of Northeast Oregon  for food bank equipment , facility renovations,
HVAC upgrades and delivery vehicles : $500,000.
(36) Clatsop Community Action for food bank warehouse renovations and equipment upgrade:
$570,000.
(37) Columbia Pacific Food Bank for equipment upgrade: $520,000.
(38) Feed’em Freedom Foundation for campus expansion: $980,000.
(39) Feeding Umpqua for warehouse renovation and truck purchase: $630,000.
(40) Klamath Lake County Food Bank for warehouse renovation and paving: $580,000.
(41) Linn Benton Food Share for delivery vehicles and equipment upgrade: $780,000.
(42) NeighborImpact for food bank equipment and operations funding: $790,000.
(43) Oregon Coast Community Action for a second warehouse to serve Curry County: $600,000.
(44) Yamhill Community Action Partnership for  warehouse renovations and delivery vehicle
costs: $580,000.
(45) Food Share of Lincoln County to purchase land and for building a new warehouse  for
pantry: $530,000.
(46) Ella Curran Community Food Bank for community food bank expansion: $690,000.
(47) South Douglas Food Bank for HVAC Upgrade: $5,000.
(48) High Desert Partnership for infrastructure to deliver and spread water in Harney  County:
$1,500,000.
(49) City of Happy Valley for the Happy Valley Library Expansion: $2,000,000.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 56
(50) Oregon Metro Transit-Oriented Development Program for  the 82nd Avenue Property Ac-
quisition Fund to secure land to  build affordable housing and affordable commercial spaces in
preparation for future development: $5,000,000.
(51) King City for the King City Park path repair and resurfacing project: $137,000.
SECTION 484.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 6, chapter 454, Oregon Laws  2023, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit  for payment of expenses from lottery moneys dis-
tributed from the Education Stability Fund to  the Higher Education Coordinating
Commission for Oregon Opportunity Grants, is increased by $17,500,000, to account for addi-
tional lottery funds revenues for the grant program.
SECTION 485.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by section 1 (4),  chapter 454,
Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for Oregon Opportunity  Grant, is
decreased by $17,500,000, to account  for additional lottery funds revenues for the grant pro-
gram.
SECTION 486. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by section 1 (9),  chapter 454,
Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium ending  June 30, 2025, for public university statewide
programs, is increased by $1,905,000, for distribution to the Oregon State  University
Veterinary Diagnostic Laboratory  to support programs to improve Oregon’s zoonotic disease
coordination, monitoring, prevention and response.
SECTION 487. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appro-
priation made to the Higher Education Coordinating  Commission by section 1 (9), chapter
454, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for public university statewide
programs, is increased by the following amounts for the following purposes:
(a) $2,013,423 for the  University of Oregon to expand and modernize training facilities for
workforce development related to the semiconductor industry.
(b) $1,946,309 for Portland State University to establish a  center for semiconductor re-
search, education, and workforce development.
(c) $2,013,423 for Oregon State University to invest in semiconductor  infrastructure in-
cluding faculty, graduate students, equipment and curriculum development.
(d) $671,141 for the Oregon Institute of Technology  for semiconductor manufacturing
training facilities in Klamath Falls.
(2) In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropriated to  the
Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025,  out of
the General Fund, the following amounts for the following purposes:
(a) $1,677,852 for Portland Community  College to increase career readiness connections
for students in high school  and adult learners, expand stackable micro-credential, certificate
and apprenticeship programs, provide tuition assistance and support to students pursuing
semiconductor workforce training and support faculty and staff.
(b) $1,677,852 for Mt. Hood Community College to build a semiconductor career pipeline,
with a focus on historically underserved populations, through enhancing career  awareness,
expanding stackable credentials, increasing skills of incumbent workers, providing  tuition
assistance and support to students and supporting faculty and staff.
SECTION 488.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to  the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by section 1 (9), chapter 454,
Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June  30, 2025, for public university statewide
programs, is increased by $100,000, for distribution to  the University of Oregon Labor Edu-
cation and Research Center to research the  potential workforce impacts across Oregon’s key
economic industries to understand the impact of automation and artificial intelligence.
SECTION 489. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (9), chapter  610, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 57
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery, Social Security  Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section 2, chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by  the Depart-
ment of Human Services, for Oregon Eligibility Partnership, is increased by $250,000, for
ONE Eligibility system changes.
SECTION 490.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 8 (2), chapter 475,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for  payment of expenses from lottery moneys
allocated from the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund to the Oregon
Business Development Department,  for business, innovation and trade, is increased by
$3,901,901, for updated committed unspent balances from the 2021-2023 biennium.
SECTION 491.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 8 (3), chapter  475, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from lottery moneys
allocated from the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund to the Oregon
Business Development Department, for infrastructure, is decreased  by $71,620, for updated
committed unspent balances from the 2021-2023 biennium.
SECTION 492.
In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to  the Oregon Business Development Department, for the biennium ending June 30,
2025, out of the General Fund, the amount  of $8,000,000, for deposit into the Economic Equity
Investment Fund established under ORS 285B.763 for  grants to organizations that provide
culturally responsive services to support  economic stability, self-sufficiency, wealth building
and economic equity among disadvantaged individuals, families, businesses and communities.
SECTION 493. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$8,000,000 is established for the  biennium ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Oregon Business Development  Department from the Economic
Equity Investment Fund established under  ORS 285B.763, for grants to organizations that
provide culturally responsive services to support  economic stability, self-sufficiency, wealth
building and  economic equity among disadvantaged individuals, families, businesses and
communities.
SECTION 494. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 7 (2), chapter 475,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses by the Oregon Business
Development Department, from the Broadband Fund  established by ORS 285A.167, for
infrastructure, is increased by $500,000, for grants to libraries for technical  assistance asso-
ciated with accessing federal broadband funding awards.
SECTION 495.
In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to  the Oregon Business Development Department, for the biennium ending June 30,
2025, out of the  General Fund, the amount of $5,918,747, to be distributed as grants to the
following venues that provide arts and cultural programming:
(1) $379,750 for the High Desert Museum.
(2) $341,775 for the Oregon Ballet Theater.
(3) $2,555,175 for the Oregon Shakespeare Festival.
(4) $949,375 for the Oregon Symphony.
(5) $743,298 for the Portland Art Museum.
(6) $474,687 for Portland Center Stage.
(7) $474,687 for the Portland Opera.
SECTION 496.
In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Business  Development Department, out of the General Fund, for the
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 58
biennium ending June 30, 2025, the following amounts  to be distributed as grants to the fol-
lowing entities for the following capital projects:
(1) $1,000,000 to Clatsop County  Historical Society for expansion of the Oregon Film Mu-
seum.
(2) $900,000 to the Black United Fund of Oregon for building  the United Futures Complex.
(3) $455,690 to Friends of the Oregon Caves  and Chateau for restoration of the Oregon
Caves Chateau.
(4) $400,000 to Columbia County Museum Association for  relocation and improved acces-
sibility of the Columbia County Museum.
(5) $424,603 to Josephine Community Library Foundation for acquisition of land for  a new
library and commons.
(6) $500,000 to Southern Oregon Historical Society for creation of an  event center and
new museum.
(7) $250,000 to Portland Art Museum for the PAM CUT Tomorrow Theater.
(8) $500,000 to Painted Sky Center for Arts for the arts building acquisition.
(9) $350,000 to Very Little Theatre for renovation and remodeling of the theater.
(10) $150,000 to Portland Institute for  Contemporary Art for capital repairs and upgrades
to their building.
(11) $500,000 to Rainier Oregon Historical Museum for a new museum building.
(12) $150,000 to Salem Parks Foundation for restoration of the Eco-Earth Globe  at Riv-
erfront Park.
(13) $300,000 to the Portland Playhouse for acquisition of Portland  Playhouse and prop-
erty.
SECTION 497.
In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Business Development Department, out of the  General Fund, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2025, the amount of $1,685,000,  for distribution to the City of
Willamina for erosion remediation of Huddleston Pond at Hampton Park.
SECTION 498. In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the biennium ending  June
30, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $1,000,000,  for distribution to the Coalition
of African and African American  Pastors to support land acquisition and development of
low-income housing.
SECTION 499. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the biennium ending  June
30, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $2,000,000, for distribution to the Old  Town
Community Association to support the Made in Old Town development project.
SECTION 500. (1) In addition to and not in lieu  of any other appropriation, there is ap-
propriated to the Emergency Board, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, out of the  Gen-
eral Fund, the amount of $35,000,000, to be allocated to the Department of Veterans’ Affairs
for the state’s matching  funds portion for construction of a veterans’ home in Roseburg,
Oregon, pursuant to ORS 408.385.
(2) If  any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not allocated
by the Emergency Board  prior to December 1, 2024, the moneys remaining on that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
SECTION 501.
 Section 40, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2024  (Enrolled House Bill 5204), is
amended to read:
Sec. 40.  (1) In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appropriated to
the Emergency Board, for the  biennium ending June 30, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount
of $4,700,000, to be allocated to the Oregon Health Authority for payments to  employers of behav-
ioral health care providers, as  described in section 20, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2024 (Enrolled
House Bill 4002), following the submission of requests for required  approval [ by] to  the Centers
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 59
for Medicare and Medicaid Services of the use of Federal Medical Assistance matching  funds by the
Oregon Health Authority for this purpose.
(2) If any of the moneys  appropriated under subsection (1) of this section are not allocated by
the Emergency Board prior to December 1,  2024, the moneys remaining on that date become avail-
able for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate funds.
SECTION 502. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the  Water Resources Department, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, out of
the General Fund, the amount of $60,000,  for distribution to the City of Sodaville for water
hauling.
SECTION 503. In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of  Transportation, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, out of
the General Fund, the amount of $500,000, for distribution to  the metropolitan service dis-
trict organized under ORS chapter 268 to study the use of  existing heavy freight rail assets
in the Portland metropolitan area  for passenger rail alternatives to existing transportation
modes.
SECTION 504. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 4 (3), chapter 475,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or  received by the Oregon Business Development Department, for
infrastructure, is increased by $52,940, for payment of issuance  costs associated with lottery
revenue bonds.
SECTION 505. Section 248, chapter 605, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 248. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on expenditures
established by section 4 (3), chapter 475, Oregon  Laws 2023, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023,
as the maximum limit for payment of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Mis-
cellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by  the
Oregon Business Development Department,  for infrastructure, is increased by the following amounts,
for the issuance of grants from proceeds of lottery revenue bonds, for the following projects:
(1) Umatilla Electrical Cooperative Association Industrial Site Utility Expansion: $5,000,000.
(2) City of Phoenix Industrial Improvements, South Valley Employment Center: $4,500,000.
(3) City of Aumsville  Wastewater [ System Improvements ] Plant Construction and Sewer Sys-
tem Improvements : [ $5,000,000] $9,000,000.
(4) City of Molalla New Wastewater Treatment Plant: $5,000,000.
(5) City of Newport Wastewater Treatment and Conveyance System Improvements: $3,825,000.
(6) Port of Coos Bay Channel Modification: $20,000,000.
SECTION 506.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 4, chapter  454, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2025, as the  maximum limit for payment of expenses from lottery moneys allo-
cated from the Administrative Services  Economic Development Fund to the Higher
Education Coordinating Commission to the Outdoor School  Education Fund, is decreased by
$20,000,000.
SECTION 507. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for the biennium ending June 30,
2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $10,000,000, for distribution to Oregon  State
University for student scholarships.
SECTION 508.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Judicial Department by section 1 (2),  chapter 380, Oregon Laws 2023, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for operations, is decreased by $7,500.
SECTION 509. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of Transportation, for the biennium ending June  30, 2025, out of
the General Fund, the amount  of $6,000,000, for distribution to the Port of Cascade Locks,
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 60
to fund engineering analysis, site investigations, project cost estimating, external outreach
and impact  analysis for a seismic retrofit and other preservation actions for the Bridge of
the Gods.
SECTION 510.
The allocation to the State Department of Agriculture of moneys deposited
into the Watershed  Conservation Operating Fund by section 4, chapter 603, Oregon Laws
2023, for activities and projects to implement Article  XV, section 4b, of the Oregon Consti-
tution, is increased by $489,666.
SECTION 511. The allocation to the  Department of State Police of moneys deposited into
the Watershed Conservation Operating Fund by  section 2, chapter 603, Oregon Laws 2023, for
fish and wildlife activities  to implement Article XV, section 4b, of the Oregon Constitution,
is increased by $356,056.
SECTION 512. The allocation  to the State Department of Fish and Wildlife of moneys
deposited into the Watershed Conservation Operating Fund by section 3,  chapter 603, Oregon
Laws 2023, for activities and projects to implement Article XV, section  4b, of the Oregon
Constitution, is increased by $434,967.
SECTION 513. The allocation to the Department of Environmental Quality of moneys
deposited into the Watershed Conservation Operating Fund by section 5,  chapter 603, Oregon
Laws 2023, for activities and projects to implement Article XV, section  4b, of the Oregon
Constitution, is increased by $375,253.
SECTION 514. Legislative Branch.  Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the au-
thorized appropriations for the  biennium ending June 30, 2025, for the following agencies and
programs are changed by the  amounts specified for 2021-2023 unexpended General Fund ap-
propriations as authorized under ORS 293.195:
2023
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $ 
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Legislative Administration
Committee:
General Program
General Fund Ch. 383 1(1) +14,766,312
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 383 1(2) +4,812
Legislative Assembly:
Biennial General Fund
General Fund Ch. 383 6 +3,270,556
82nd Legislative Assembly
General Fund Ch. 383 7(1) +175,207
83rd Legislative Assembly
General Fund Ch. 383 7(2) +3,453,718
Legislative Equity Office
General Fund Ch. 383 8 +1,659,877
Legislative Counsel
Committee:
General Program
General Fund Ch. 383 11 +2,008,096
Legislative Fiscal
Officer:
Operating Expenses
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 61
General Fund Ch. 383 14(1) +1,569,815
Legislative Policy and
Research Committee:
Operating Expenses
General Fund Ch. 383 15 +362,994
Legislative Revenue
Officer:
Operating Expenses
General Fund Ch. 383 16 +145,912
Commission on Indian
Services:
Operating Expenses
General Fund Ch. 383 17 +8,000
SECTION 515. Judicial Branch.  Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the author-
ized appropriations for the biennium ending June 30,  2025, for the following agencies and
programs are changed by the  amounts specified for 2021-2023 unexpended General Fund ap-
propriations as authorized under ORS 293.195:
2023
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $ 
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Commission on Judicial
Fitness and Disability:
Administration
General Fund Ch. 381 1(1) +16,646
Extraordinary Expenses
General Fund Ch. 381 1(2) +14,755
Judicial Department:
Judicial Compensation
General Fund Ch. 380 1(1) +652,875
Operations
General Fund Ch. 380 1(2) +1,844,553
Mandated Payments
General Fund Ch. 380 1(3) +376,889
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 380 1(5) +951
Third-party Debt
Collection
General Fund Ch. 380 1(6) +1,163,993
Public Defense Services
Commission:
Executive Division
General Fund Ch. 481 1(1) +127,212
Compliance, Audit and
Performance Division
General Fund Ch. 481 1(2) +652,115
Appellate Division
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 62
General Fund Ch. 481 1(3) +247,007
Adult Trial Division
General Fund Ch. 481 1(4) +1,642,758
Preauthorized Expenses
General Fund Ch. 481 1(6) +3,850,825
Court Mandated Expenses
General Fund Ch. 481 1(7) +3,156,746
Parent Child Representation
Program
General Fund Ch. 481 1(8) +2,193,743
Administrative Services
Division
General Fund Ch. 481 1(9) +835
Special Programs,
Contracts, and
Distributions Division
General Fund Ch. 481 1(10) +98,369
SECTION 516. Administration. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the author-
ized appropriations and expenditure limitations for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for the
following agencies and programs are changed by the amounts specified:
2023
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $ 
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Oregon Advocacy Commissions
Office:
Operating Expenses
General Fund Ch. 59 1 +161,011
Oregon Department of
Administrative Services:
Chief Operating Office
General Fund Ch. 375 1(1) +20,543
Other funds Ch. 375 2(1) +494,916
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 375 1(6) +150,000
Chief Financial Office
General Fund Ch. 605 263 +14,875
Other funds Ch. 375 2(2) +1,127,324
Federal funds Ch. 375 5(1) +180,816
Office of the State Chief
Information Officer - Policy
Other funds Ch. 375
2(3)(a) +3,902,750
Chief Human Resources
Office
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 63
Other funds Ch. 375 2(4) +2,070,321
OSCIO - State Data Center
- Operations
Other funds Ch. 375
2(5)(a) +3,507,172
Enterprise Asset
Management
Other funds Ch. 375 2(6) +3,579,868
Enterprise Goods and
Services
Other funds Ch. 375 2(7) +5,600,303
Business Services
Other funds Ch. 375 2(8) +236,444
Debt Service - ODAS
Other funds Ch. 375 2(12) +1,336,041
ODAS Information
Technology
Other funds Ch. 375 2(14) +1,020,571
Debt Service and Related
Costs for Bonds Issued
Lottery funds Ch. 375 3 -1,470,412
Public Records Advocate:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 63 1 +91,908
State Treasurer:
Administrative Services
Other funds Ch. 365 1(1) +1,892,002
Trust Property Services
Other funds Ch. 365 1(2) +414,625
Investment Services
Other funds Ch. 365 1(3) +3,179,154
Public Savings Services
Other funds Ch. 365 1(4) +320,450
State and Local Government
Financial Services
Other funds Ch. 365 1(5) +804,295
Oregon Racing Commission:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 615 1 +207,367
Public Employees
Retirement System:
Central Administration
Division
Other funds Ch. 457 1(1) +2,069,770
Financial and Administrative
Services Division
Other funds Ch. 457 1(2) +790,509
Information Services
Division
Other funds Ch. 457 1(3) +2,068,323
Operations Division
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 64
Other funds Ch. 457 1(4) +3,712,338
Compliance, Audit and
Risk Division
Other funds Ch. 457 1(5) +462,090
Core Retirement System
Operational Implementation
Other funds Ch. 457
1(6)(a)(D) +692,582
Secretary of State:
Administrative Services
Division
General Fund Ch. 458 1(1) +403,407
Other funds Ch. 458 2(1) +2,410,553
Elections Division
General Fund Ch. 458 1(2) +793,685
Federal funds Ch. 458 3 +34,892
Audits Division
Other funds Ch. 458 2(3) +2,692,642
Archives Division
Other funds Ch. 458 2(4) +764,906
Corporation Division
Other funds Ch. 458 2(5) +1,180,783
Oregon Liquor and
Cannabis Commission:
Administrative Expenses
Other funds Ch. 385 1(1) +5,254,616
Marijuana Regulation
- Recreational
Other funds Ch. 385 1(2) +1,727,100
Marijuana Regulation
- Medical
Other funds Ch. 385 1(3) +410,891
Department of Revenue:
Administration
General Fund Ch. 361 1(1) +1,357,502
Other funds Ch. 361 2(1) +551,789
Property Tax Division
General Fund Ch. 361 1(2) +1,385,268
Other funds Ch. 361 2(2) +400,158
Personal Tax and
Compliance Division
General Fund Ch. 361 1(3) +4,838,927
Other funds Ch. 361 2(3) +95,520
Business Division
General Fund Ch. 361 1(4) +1,595,375
Other funds Ch. 361 2(4) +1,115,057
Collections Division
General Fund Ch. 361 1(5) +2,445,189
Other funds Ch. 361 2(5) +1,374,786
Information Technology
Services Division
General Fund Ch. 361 1(6) +2,723,155
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 65
Other funds Ch. 361 2(7) +919,553
Corporate Division
Other funds Ch. 361 2(6) +942,514
Marijuana Program
Other funds Ch. 361 2(8) +147,512
Senior Property Tax
Deferral Program
Other funds Ch. 361 2(9) +127,348
Employment Relations
Board:
Operating Expenses
General Fund Ch. 79 1 +208,757
Operating Expenses
- Fees
Other funds Ch. 79 2 +6,621
Assessments of Agencies
Other funds Ch. 79 3 +157,404
Office of the Governor:
Operating Expenses
General Fund Ch. 358 1 +1,360,850
Other funds Ch. 358 4 +270,716
Regional Solutions
Program
Lottery funds Ch. 358 3 +283,813
Oregon Government Ethics
Commission:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 61 1 +283,580
State Library:
Operating Expenses
General Fund Ch. 384 1 +197,612
Operating Expenses
- Fees
Other funds Ch. 384 2 +13,419
Operating Expenses
- Assessments
Other funds Ch. 384 3 +419,623
Operating Expenses
- Federal
Federal funds Ch. 384 4 +128,202
SECTION 517. Consumer and Business Services.  Notwithstanding any other provision  of
law, the authorized appropriations and expenditure limitations for  the biennium ending June
30, 2025, for the following agencies and programs are changed by the amounts specified:
2023
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $ 
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 66
Oregon Board of Accountancy:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 78 1 +127,780
State Board of Tax
Practitioners:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 64 1 +39,564
Construction Contractors
Board:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 353 1 +1,090,664
Mental Health Regulatory
Agency:
Oregon Board of Licensed
Professional Counselors
and Therapists
Other funds Ch. 359 1 +205,429
Oregon Board of
Psychology
Other funds Ch. 359 2 +90,238
State Board of Chiropractic
Examiners:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 60 1 +118,292
State Board of Licensed
Social Workers:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 80 1 +137,902
Oregon Board of Dentistry:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 355 1 +185,146
Health-Related Licensing
Boards:
State Mortuary and
Cemetery Board
Other funds Ch. 62 1 +142,600
Oregon Board of
Naturopathic Medicine
Other funds Ch. 62 2 +66,621
Occupational Therapy
Licensing Board
Other funds Ch. 62 3 +33,067
Board of Medical Imaging
Other funds Ch. 62 4 +70,528
State Board of Examiners
for Speech-Language
Pathology and Audiology
Other funds Ch. 62 5 +57,097
Oregon State Veterinary
Medical Examining Board
Other funds Ch. 62 6 +85,804
Bureau of Labor and
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 67
Industries:
Operating Expenses
General Fund Ch. 471 1 +1,665,380
Other funds Ch. 471 2 +629,978
Federal funds Ch. 471 4 +179,215
Wage Security Fund
Administration
Other funds Ch. 471 3(1) +387,900
Veteran Apprenticeship
Services
Lottery funds Ch. 471 5 +19,035
Grants to Local Service
Districts and Local
Joint Committees
General Fund Ch. 496 2 +19,046
Public Utility Commission
of Oregon:
Utility Program
Other funds Ch. 483 1(1) +2,530,009
Residential Service
Protection Fund
Other funds Ch. 483 1(2) +92,843
Administration
Other funds Ch. 483 1(3) +496,612
Oregon Board of Maritime
Pilots
Other funds Ch. 483 1(4) +45,056
Operating Expenses
Federal funds Ch. 483 2 +79,278
Department of Consumer
and Business Services:
Workers’ Compensation
Board
Other funds Ch. 354 1(1) +1,883,377
Workers’ Compensation
Division
Other funds Ch. 354 1(2) +3,693,192
Oregon OSHA
Other funds Ch. 354 1(3) +3,278,354
Federal funds Ch. 354 2(1) +1,205,623
Central Services Division
Other funds Ch. 354 1(4) +3,985,385
Federal funds Ch. 354 2(2) +28,560
Division of Financial
Regulation
Other funds Ch. 354 1(5) +4,244,421
Building Codes Division
Other funds Ch. 354 1(6) +2,803,194
Federal funds Ch. 354 2(3) +28,792
Universal Health Plan
Governance Board
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 68
General Fund Ch. 613 8 +60,862
Real Estate Agency:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 387 1 +695,110
Oregon State Board of
Nursing:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 474 1 +1,100,492
Oregon Medical Board:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 94 1 +830,290
State Board of Pharmacy:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 479 1 +543,104
SECTION 518. Economic Development.  Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the
authorized appropriations and expenditure limitations for the biennium ending June 30, 2025,
for the following agencies and programs are changed by the amounts specified:
2023
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $ 
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Oregon Business Development
Department:
Arts
General Fund Ch. 475 1(1) +103,947
Business, Innovation and
Trade
Other funds Ch. 475 4(2) +894,892
Lottery funds Ch. 475 8(2) +824,443
Federal funds Ch. 475 9(2) +159,777
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 475 1(2) -32,500
Other funds Ch. 605 251 +67,980
Infrastructure
Other funds Ch. 475 4(3) +599,435
Lottery funds Ch. 475 8(3) +257,752
Federal funds Ch. 475 9(3) +218,645
Operations
Other funds Ch. 475 4(1) +373,563
Lottery funds Ch. 475 8(1) +898,435
Federal funds Ch. 475 9(1) +56,465
Arts
Other funds Ch. 475 4(4) +133,336
Lottery Bond Debt Service
Lottery funds Ch. 475 8(5) -34,660
Aquifer Recharge Testing
Forgivable Loan Program
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 69
General Fund Ch. 606 55 +18,892
Housing and Community
Services Department:
Operating Expenses
General Fund Ch. 390 1 +1,299,116
Other funds Ch. 390 2 +6,614,629
Federal funds Ch. 390 4 +2,160,297
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 390 5 -503,300
Other funds Ch. 605 287 +1,396,554
Lottery funds Ch. 605 286 -862,853
Department of Veterans’
Affairs:
Services Provided by
the Department
General Fund Ch. 485 1(1) +466,757
Lottery funds Ch. 485 2(1) +479,704
Administration, Grants
and Services Supplied to
Veterans
Other funds Ch. 485 4 +1,064,700
Payment of Expenses
Federal funds Ch. 485 5 +51,595
Employment Department:
Unemployment Insurance,
Shared Services and
Workforce Operations,
Contributions and Recovery,
and Workforce and
Economic Research
Other funds Ch. 379 1(1) +13,794,780
Office of Administrative
Hearings
Other funds Ch. 379 1(2) +2,390,513
Family and Medical Leave
Insurance Program
Other funds Ch. 379 1(3) +5,378,768
Modernization Initiative
Other funds Ch. 379 1(4) +1,784,363
Operating Budget
Federal funds Ch. 379 4 +11,598,575
SECTION 519. Education. Notwithstanding any  other provision of law, the authorized
appropriations and expenditure limitations for the biennium ending June 30,  2025, for the
following agencies and programs are changed by the amounts specified:
2023
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $ 
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 70
Teacher Standards and
Practices Commission:
Operating Expenses
General Fund Ch. 484 1 +79,038
Other funds Ch. 484 2 +518,919
Department of Education:
Operations
General Fund Ch. 449 1(1) +5,865,840
Other funds Ch. 449 6(2) +1,855,747
Federal funds Ch. 449 8(1) +3,886,521
Oregon School for the Deaf
General Fund Ch. 449 1(2) +1,087,876
Other funds Ch. 449 6(4) +203,473
Federal funds Ch. 449 8(2) +11,986
Debt Service on General
Obligation Bonds
General Fund Ch. 449 4 -142,930
Debt Service
Other funds Ch. 605 49 +143,500
Statewide Education
Initiatives Account
- Operations
Other funds Ch. 449 14 +2,005,148
CAT Transfer
Other funds Ch. 449 12 -24,005
Department of Early
Learning and Care:
Operations
General Fund Ch. 448 1(1) +3,572,747
Other funds Ch. 448 2(1) +229,004
Federal funds Ch. 448 3(1) +2,797,376
Operations Transfer from
Early Learning Account
Other funds Ch. 448 4(1) +323,379
Higher Education
Coordinating Commission:
HECC Programs, Grants
and Operations
General Fund Ch. 454 1(1) +2,555,091
Other funds Ch. 454 8(1) +849,370
Federal funds Ch. 454 11 +760,916
Oregon Tribal Student
Grant
General Fund Ch. 454 1(6) +18,925
Debt Service on General
Obligation Bonds
- Public Universities
General Fund Ch. 454
1(11)(a) -19,132,465
Other funds Ch. 454 8(3) +19,132,685
American Rescue Plan Act,
Workforce Ready Grants
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 71
(Sections 9 and 11, chapter
28, Oregon Laws 2022)
Other funds Ch. 454 10 +203,936
Maritime Workforce
General Fund Ch. 546 18 +14,198
Sexual Misconduct Survey
Council
General Fund Ch. 550 16 +66,405
SECTION 520. Human Services.  Notwithstanding any  other provision of law, the author-
ized appropriations and expenditure limitations for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for the
following agencies and programs are changed by the amounts specified:
2023
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $ 
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Long Term Care Ombudsman:
General Program and Services
Provided to Care Facility
Residents
General Fund Ch. 472 1(1) +466,071
Public Guardian and
Conservator Program
General Fund Ch. 472 1(2) +315,826
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 472 2 +48,801
Commission for the Blind:
Operating Expenses
General Fund Ch. 376 1 +343,817
Other funds Ch. 376 2 +6,456
Federal funds Ch. 376 3 +944,242
Psychiatric Security Review
Board:
Operating Expenses
General Fund Ch. 480 1 +279,854
Department of Human
Services:
Central Services
General Fund Ch. 610 1(1) +4,013,921
Other funds Ch. 610 2(1) +74,311
Federal funds Ch. 610 3(1) +2,922,847
State Assessments and
Enterprise-Wide Costs
General Fund Ch. 610 1(2) +10,966,321
Other funds Ch. 610 2(2) +737,297
Federal funds Ch. 610 3(2) +7,073,308
Self-Sufficiency Programs
General Fund Ch. 610 1(3) +9,212,836
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 72
Other funds Ch. 610 2(3) +3,214
Federal funds Ch. 610 3(3) +6,652,858
Vocational Rehabilitation
Services
General Fund Ch. 610 1(4) +1,265,681
Other funds Ch. 610 2(4) +85,836
Federal funds Ch. 610 3(4) +4,053,793
Child Welfare Programs
General Fund Ch. 610 1(5) +47,195,219
Other funds Ch. 610 2(5) -37,903
Federal funds Ch. 610 3(5) +18,257,613
Aging and People With
Disabilities Programs
General Fund Ch. 610 1(6) +13,062,253
Other funds Ch. 610 2(6) +269,106
Federal funds Ch. 610 3(6) +13,406,930
Intellectual/Developmental
Disabilities Programs
General Fund Ch. 610 1(7) +6,956,243
Other funds Ch. 610 2(7) +31,697
Federal funds Ch. 610 3(7) +10,599,422
Oregon Eligibility
Partnership
General Fund Ch. 610 1(8) +25,941,283
Other funds Ch. 610 2(9) +55,381
Federal funds Ch. 610 3(8) +19,995,212
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 610 1(9) -2,000
Other funds Ch. 605 317 +3,000
Shared Services
Other funds Ch. 610 2(8) +14,097,612
Oregon Health Authority:
Health Systems Division
- Administration
General Fund Ch. 591 1(1) +7,387,911
Other funds Ch. 591 2(1) +1,056,725
Lottery funds Ch. 591 3(1) +143,012
Federal funds Ch. 591 5(1) +5,560,261
Health Policy and
Analytics
General Fund Ch. 591 1(3) +2,937,199
Other funds Ch. 591 2(3) +1,963,978
Federal funds Ch. 591 5(3) +1,683,001
Public Health
General Fund Ch. 591 1(4) +3,638,161
Other funds Ch. 591 2(5) +6,217,891
Federal funds Ch. 591 5(4) +8,711,854
Oregon State Hospital
General Fund Ch. 591 1(5) +52,008,526
Other funds Ch. 591 2(7) +812,043
Federal funds Ch. 591 5(5) +2,420,315
Central Services
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 73
General Fund Ch. 591 1(6) +4,604,003
Other funds Ch. 591 2(8) +323,556
Federal funds Ch. 591 5(6) +1,361,069
State Assessments and
Enterprise-Wide Costs
General Fund Ch. 591 1(7) +6,380,073
Other funds Ch. 591 2(9) +866,640
Federal funds Ch. 591 5(7) +2,721,901
Shared Administrative
Services
Other funds Ch. 591
2(10) +14,659,298
SECTION 521. Judicial Branch.  Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the author-
ized appropriations and expenditure limitations for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for the
following agencies and programs are changed by the amounts specified:
2023
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $ 
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Commission on Judicial
Fitness and Disability:
Administration
General Fund Ch. 381 1(1) +21,694
Judicial Department:
Judicial Compensation
General Fund Ch. 380 1(1) +7,429,833
Operations
General Fund Ch. 380 1(2) +36,116,761
Other funds Ch. 380 2(1) +1,716,712
Federal funds Ch. 380 3 +48,754
Mandated Payments
General Fund Ch. 380 1(3) +477,822
Other funds Ch. 380 2(2) +9,294
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 380 1(5) -2,502,691
Other funds Ch. 605 137 +2,522,130
State Court Facilities
and Security Account
Other funds Ch. 380 2(3) +111,732
State Court Technology
Fund
Other funds Ch. 380 2(4) +979,865
Public Defense Services
Commission:
Executive Division
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 74
General Fund Ch. 481 1(1) +348,017
Compliance, Audit and
Performance Division
General Fund Ch. 481 1(2) +537,916
Appellate Division
General Fund Ch. 481 1(3) +1,932,884
Adult Trial Division
General Fund Ch. 481 1(4) +446,118
Parent Child Representation
Program
General Fund Ch. 481 1(8) +25,560
Administrative Services
Division
General Fund Ch. 481 1(9) +926,566
SECTION 522. Legislative Branch.  Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  au-
thorized appropriations and expenditure limitations for the biennium ending June 30, 2025,
for the following agencies and programs are changed by the amounts specified:
2023
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $ 
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Legislative Administration
Committee:
General Program
General Fund Ch. 383 1(1) +1,755,255
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 383 1(2) -1,291,812
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 383 2 +15,077
Legislative Assembly:
Biennial General Fund
General Fund Ch. 383 6 +1,276,759
82nd Legislative Assembly
General Fund Ch. 383 7(1) +2,074,114
83rd Legislative Assembly
General Fund Ch. 383 7(2) +995,659
Legislative Equity Office
General Fund Ch. 383 8 +44,246
Legislative Counsel
Committee:
General Program
General Fund Ch. 383 11 +1,368,431
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 383 12 +154,194
Legislative Fiscal
Officer:
Operating Expenses
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 75
General Fund Ch. 383 14(1) +548,127
Other funds Ch. 383 14(2) +326,638
Legislative Policy and
Research Committee:
Operating Expenses
General Fund Ch. 383 15 +1,315,788
Legislative Revenue
Officer:
Operating Expenses
General Fund Ch. 383 16 +254,916
Commission on Indian
Services:
Operating Expenses
General Fund Ch. 383 17 +68,030
SECTION 523. Natural Resources.  Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the au-
thorized appropriations and expenditure limitations for the biennium ending June 30, 2025,
for the following agencies and programs are changed by the amounts specified:
2023
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $ 
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
State Marine Board:
Administration and
Education
Other funds Ch. 473 1(1) +458,611
Marine Law Enforcement
Other funds Ch. 473 1(2) +150,111
Facilities Construction
and Maintenance
Other funds Ch. 473 1(3) +175,575
Federal funds Ch. 473 2(3) +19,132
Aquatic Invasive Species
Other funds Ch. 473 1(4) +28,077
State Department of
Energy:
Energy Development
Services
General Fund Ch. 451 1(1) +286,805
Nuclear Safety and
Emergency Response
General Fund Ch. 451 1(2) +28,323
Energy Efficient Technology
Information and Training
General Fund Ch. 442 87 +30,774
Oregon Climate Action
Commission
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 76
General Fund Ch. 442 90 +32,226
Natural and Working Lands
General Fund Ch. 442 91 +37,598
Environmental Justice
Community Assistance
General Fund Ch. 562 10(2) +22,558
Operations
Other funds Ch. 451 2 +2,077,551
Federal funds Ch. 451 4 +240,512
State Department of
Geology and Mineral
Industries:
Mined Land Reclamation
General Fund Ch. 470 1(2) +60,023
Other funds Ch. 470 2(2) +310,752
Geologic Survey
General Fund Ch. 470 1(1) +400,584
Other funds Ch. 470 2(1) +46,468
Federal funds Ch. 470 3 +141,302
State Parks and Recreation
Department:
Debt Service
Lottery funds Ch. 477 4 -143,305
Director’s Office
Other funds Ch. 477 2(1) +42,368
Lottery funds Ch. 477 3(1) +90,038
Central Services
Other funds Ch. 477 2(2) +904,914
Lottery funds Ch. 477 3(2) +905,953
Direct Services
Other funds Ch. 477 2(4) +4,208,239
Lottery funds Ch. 477 3(4) +4,059,703
Federal funds Ch. 477 5(2) +23,067
Community Support and
Grants
Other funds Ch. 477 2(5) +126,715
Lottery funds Ch. 477 3(5) +399,262
Federal funds Ch. 477 5(3) +94,966
Land Use Board of Appeals:
General Fund Ch. 456 1 +212,774
Water Resources
Department:
Administrative Services
General Fund Ch. 460 1(1) +673,776
Other funds Ch. 460 3(1) +132,512
Field Services
General Fund Ch. 460 1(2) +1,581,621
Other funds Ch. 460 3(2) +207,309
Water Rights and
Adjudications
General Fund Ch. 460 1(3) +361,506
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 77
Other funds Ch. 460 3(3) +355,886
Technical Services
General Fund Ch. 460 1(4) +871,951
Other funds Ch. 460 3(4) +263,771
Federal funds Ch. 460 4(4) +18,418
Director’s Office
General Fund Ch. 460 1(5) +734,117
Debt Service
Lottery funds Ch. 460 2 -1,754,019
Oregon Watershed
Enhancement Board:
Operations
General Fund Ch. 603 1 +123,899
Other funds Ch. 603 7(1) +120,616
Lottery funds Ch. 603 6 +487,889
Federal funds Ch. 603 8(1) +328,128
Department of State Lands:
Common School Fund
Programs
Other funds Ch. 459 1(1) +2,026,066
South Slough National
Estuarine Research
Reserve Operations
Other funds Ch. 459 1(2) +199,216
Federal funds Ch. 459 6(1) +155,619
State Department of
Agriculture:
Administrative and
Support Services
General Fund Ch. 350 1(1) +181,918
Other funds Ch. 350 2(1) +756,240
Food Safety
General Fund Ch. 350 1(2) +706,281
Other funds Ch. 350 2(2) +1,965,094
Federal funds Ch. 350 4(2) +16,746
Natural Resources
General Fund Ch. 350 1(3) +688,541
Other funds Ch. 350 2(3) +1,319,022
Federal funds Ch. 350 4(3) +300,271
Market Access
General Fund Ch. 350 1(4) +155,123
Other funds Ch. 350 2(4) +1,149,675
Federal funds Ch. 350 4(4) +152,841
Parks and Natural
Resources Fund
Lottery funds Ch. 350 3 +489,666
Department of
Environmental Quality:
Air Quality
General Fund Ch. 452 1(1) +1,369,109
Other funds Ch. 452 2(1) +3,852,279
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 78
Federal funds Ch. 452 5(1) +583,525
Water Quality
General Fund Ch. 452 1(2) +3,086,020
Other funds Ch. 452 2(2) +1,908,231
Lottery funds Ch. 452 3 +375,253
Federal funds Ch. 452 5(2) +598,455
Land Quality
General Fund Ch. 452 1(3) +131,904
Other funds Ch. 452 2(3) +3,999,250
Federal funds Ch. 452 5(3) +502,618
Agency Management
General Fund Ch. 452 1(4) +233,269
Other funds Ch. 452 2(4) +2,678,707
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 452 1(5) -215,000
Other funds Ch. 605 267 +217,000
State Department of
Fish and Wildlife:
Fish Division
General Fund Ch. 590 1(1) +1,441,952
Other funds Ch. 590 2(1) +4,069,715
Lottery funds Ch. 590 3(1) +357,178
Federal funds Ch. 590 4(1) +5,444,962
Wildlife Division
General Fund Ch. 590 1(2) +422,829
Other funds Ch. 590 2(2) +1,727,039
Lottery funds Ch. 590 3(2) +77,789
Federal funds Ch. 590 4(2) +1,372,506
Administrative Services
Division
General Fund Ch. 590 1(3) +626,791
Other funds Ch. 590 2(3) +3,051,422
Federal funds Ch. 590 4(3) +393,855
Capital Improvement
Other funds Ch. 590 2(4) +51,955
Habitat Division
General Fund Ch. 590 1(7) +604,019
Other funds Ch. 590 2(7) +370,825
Federal funds Ch. 590 4(5) +489,483
State Forestry Department:
Agency Administration
Other funds Ch. 453 2(1) +2,598,477
Federal funds Ch. 453 4(1) +39,444
Fire Protection
General Fund Ch. 453 1(1) +3,662,935
Other funds Ch. 453 2(2) +5,839,790
Federal funds Ch. 453 4(2) +508,537
Forest Resources
General Fund Ch. 453 1(2) +2,514,725
Other funds Ch. 453 2(4) +1,241,254
Federal funds Ch. 453 4(4) +596,397
Debt Service
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 79
General Fund Ch. 453 1(4) -409,057
Other funds Ch. 453 2(7) +409,117
State Forests
Other funds Ch. 453 2(3) +4,125,959
Planning Branch
General Fund Ch. 453 1(3) +29,172
Other funds Ch. 453 2(5) +131,150
Federal funds Ch. 453 4(5) +14,006
Equipment Pool
General Fund Ch. 453 1(5) +32,632
Other funds Ch. 453 2(8) +628,060
Department of Land
Conservation and
Development:
Planning Program
General Fund Ch. 455 1(1) +1,308,049
Other funds Ch. 455 2 +128,240
Federal funds Ch. 455 3 +346,770
Columbia River Gorge
Commission:
General Fund Ch. 352 1 +1,076
SECTION 524. Public Safety. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the authorized
appropriations and expenditure limitations for the biennium ending June 30,  2025, for the
following agencies and programs are changed by the amounts specified:
2023
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $ 
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
State Board of Parole and
Post-Prison Supervision:
General Fund Ch. 478 1 +620,202
Department of State Police:
Patrol Services, Criminal
Investigations and Gaming
Enforcement
General Fund Ch. 386 1(1) +12,962,999
Other funds Ch. 386 2(1) +1,839,795
Federal funds Ch. 386 3(1) +74,668
Fish and Wildlife
Enforcement
General Fund Ch. 386 1(2) +786,275
Other funds Ch. 386 2(2) +1,545,940
Lottery funds Ch. 386 4 +356,056
Forensic Services and
Chief Medical Examiner
General Fund Ch. 386 1(3) +509,267
Other funds Ch. 386 2(3) +11,938
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 80
Federal funds Ch. 386 3(3) -595
Administrative Services,
Agency Support and
Criminal Justice
Information Services
General Fund Ch. 386 1(4) +9,481,412
Other funds Ch. 386 2(4) +1,654,065
Department of Corrections:
Central Administration
and Administrative Services
General Fund Ch. 377 1(2) +9,851,706
Other funds Ch. 377 2(2) +1,142,079
Correctional Services
General Fund Ch. 377 1(3) +4,531,156
Community Corrections
General Fund Ch. 377 1(4) +1,596,174
Operations and Health
Services
General Fund Ch. 377 1(1) +85,321,266
Other funds Ch. 377 2(1) +317,401
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 377 1(5) -622,970
Other funds Ch. 605 191 +623,100
Oregon Criminal Justice
Commission:
General Fund Ch. 378 1 +592,380
Other funds Ch. 378 3 +24,034
Federal funds Ch. 378 4 +75,270
District Attorneys:
Department of Justice
for District Attorneys
General Fund Ch. 356 1 +951,378
Department of Justice:
Office of the Attorney
General and Administration
General Fund Ch. 382 1(1) +289,379
Other funds Ch. 382 2(1) +3,314,590
Appellate Division
General Fund Ch. 382 1(2) -23,795
Other funds Ch. 382 2(2) +2,072,692
Criminal Justice Division
General Fund Ch. 382 1(3) +1,474,273
Other funds Ch. 382 2(5) +412,665
Federal funds Ch. 382 3(2) +48,729
Crime Victim and Survivor
Services Division
General Fund Ch. 382 1(4) +3,447,143
Other funds Ch. 382 2(6) +225,173
Federal funds Ch. 382 3(3) +324,909
Defense of Criminal
Convictions
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 81
General Fund Ch. 382 1(5) -2,585,661
Division of Child Support
General Fund Ch. 382 1(6) +2,477,213
Other funds Ch. 382 2(9) +637,076
Federal funds Ch. 382 3(4) +6,323,191
Civil Enforcement Division
Other funds Ch. 382 2(3) +4,343,998
Federal funds Ch. 382 3(1) +360,677
Child Advocacy Division
Other funds Ch. 382 2(4) +4,570,392
General Counsel Division
Other funds Ch. 382 2(7) +10,203,939
Trial Division
Other funds Ch. 382 2(8) +6,417,706
Oregon Military
Department:
Administration
General Fund Ch. 360 1(1) +593,912
Other funds Ch. 360 2(1) +198,689
Operations
General Fund Ch. 360 1(2) +313,729
Other funds Ch. 360 2(2) +413,653
Federal funds Ch. 360 3(1) +5,263,316
Community Support
Other funds Ch. 360 2(3) +276,353
Federal funds Ch. 360 3(2) +1,182,313
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 360 1(4) -21,660
Other funds Ch. 605 194 +22,200
Oregon Department of
Emergency Management:
Administration
General Fund Ch. 357 1(1) +990,537
Other funds Ch. 357 2(1) +16,889
Federal funds Ch. 357 3(1) +84,503
Preparedness and Response
General Fund Ch. 357 1(2) +383,631
Other funds Ch. 357 2(3) +36,943
Federal funds Ch. 357 3(2) +346,376
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 357 1(4) -51,000
Other funds Ch. 605 195 +51,500
9-1-1 Emergency Program
Other funds Ch. 357 2(2) +207,312
Mitigation and Recovery
General Fund Ch. 357 1(3) +189,426
Federal funds Ch. 357 3(3) +820,393
Department of Public
Safety Standards and
Training:
Operations
Other funds Ch. 482 2(1) +4,022,853
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 82
Federal funds Ch. 482 3 +30,835
Oregon Youth Authority:
Facility Programs
General Fund Ch. 487 1(1) +13,415,188
Other funds Ch. 487 2(1) +2,044,238
Community Programs
General Fund Ch. 487 1(2) +2,478,533
Federal funds Ch. 487 3(1) +430,578
Program Support
General Fund Ch. 487 1(3) +3,082,816
Other funds Ch. 487 2(3) +340
Federal funds Ch. 487 3(2) +102,278
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 487 1(6) -25,900
Other funds Ch. 605 203 +27,100
Department of the State
Fire Marshal:
General Fund Ch. 224 1 +2,552,431
Other funds Ch. 224 2 +1,647,263
SECTION 525. Transportation. Notwithstanding any  other provision of law, the author-
ized appropriations and expenditure limitations for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for the
following agencies and programs are changed by the amounts specified:
2023
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $ 
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Oregon Department of
Aviation:
Operations
Other funds Ch. 362 2(1) +256,583
Federal funds Ch. 362 3(1) +13,312
Aircraft Registration
Other funds Ch. 362 2(2) +12,536
Pavement Maintenance
Other funds Ch. 362 2(3) +14,357
Department of
Transportation:
Maintenance
Other funds Ch. 363 2(2) +22,247,916
Project Delivery and
Support
Other funds Ch. 363 2(3) +31,732,059
Local Government Program
Other funds Ch. 363 2(4) +1,297,129
Driver and Motor Vehicle
Services
Other funds Ch. 363 2(5) +14,183,667
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 83
Federal funds Ch. 363 3(1) +217,047
State Board of Towing
Other funds Ch. 363 2(6) +34,123
Commerce and Compliance
Other funds Ch. 363 2(7) +5,584,392
Federal funds Ch. 363 3(2) +129,989
Policy, Data and Analysis
Other funds Ch. 363 2(8) +4,464,625
Federal funds Ch. 363 3(3) +13,362
Public Transportation
Other funds Ch. 363 2(9) +944,868
Administrative Services
Other funds Ch. 363 2(10) +8,617,220
Finance and Budget
Other funds Ch. 363 2(11) +4,289,656
Debt Service
Other funds Ch. 363 2(12) +1,513,400
Lottery funds Ch. 363 4 -1,513,400
SECTION 526. Section 318, chapter 605, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 318.  Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the authorized appropriations and ex-
penditure limitations for the biennium ending June 30, [ 2023] 2025, for the following agencies and
programs are changed by the amounts specified:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(1) ADMINISTRATION.
_______________________________________________________________________________________
2023
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $ 
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Oregon Advocacy Commissions
Office:
Operating Expenses
General Fund Ch. 59 1 -88
Oregon Department of
Administrative Services:
Chief Operating Office
General Fund Ch. 375 1(1) -908
Other funds Ch. 375 2(1) -54,148
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 375 1(6) -205,700
Chief Financial Office
Other funds Ch. 375 2(2) -35,470
Office of the State Chief
Information Officer - Policy
Other funds Ch. 375 2(3)(a) -279,598
Chief Human Resources
Office
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 84
Other funds Ch. 375 2(4) -104,645
OSCIO - State Data Center
- Operations
Other funds Ch. 375 2(5)(a) -1,679,903
Enterprise Asset
Management
Other funds Ch. 375 2(6) +747,814
Enterprise Goods and
Services
Other funds Ch. 375 2(7) -1,819,820
Business Services
Other funds Ch. 375 2(8) +428,961
Debt Service - ODAS
Other funds Ch. 375 2(12) -1,975,174
ODAS Information
Technology
Other funds Ch. 375 2(14) -75,916
Debt Service and Related
Costs for Bonds Issued
Lottery funds Ch. 375 3 +374,600
Public Records Advocate:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 63 1 +8,958
State Treasurer:
Administrative Services
Other funds Ch. 365 1(1) -113,132
Trust Property Services
Other funds Ch. 365 1(2) -50,403
Investment Services
Other funds Ch. 365 1(3) -21,344
Public Savings Services
Other funds Ch. 365 1(4) -17,554
State and Local Government
Financial Services
Other funds Ch. 365 1(5) -6,773
Public Employees
Retirement System:
Central Administration
Division
Other funds Ch. 457 1(1) -99,942
Financial and Administrative
Services Division
Other funds Ch. 457 1(2) -1,220,406
Information Services
Division
Other funds Ch. 457 1(3) -9,333
Operations Division
Other funds Ch. 457 1(4) -10,953
Compliance, Audit and
Risk Division
Other funds Ch. 457 1(5) -83,247
Secretary of State:
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 85
Administrative Services
Division
General Fund Ch. 458 1(1) -5,887
Other funds Ch. 458 2(1) -59,946
Elections Division
General Fund Ch. 458 1(2) -65,823
Other funds Ch. 458 2(2) -42
Federal funds Ch. 458 3 -7,212
Audits Division
Other funds Ch. 458 2(3) -48,620
Archives Division
Other funds Ch. 458 2(4) -76,291
Corporation Division
Other funds Ch. 458 2(5) -48,178
Oregon Liquor and
Cannabis Commission:
Administrative Expenses
Other funds Ch. 385 1(1) -85,429
Marijuana Regulation
- Recreational
Other funds Ch. 385 1(2) -174,602
Marijuana Regulation
- Medical
Other funds Ch. 385 1(3) -34,942
Capital Improvements
Other funds Ch. 385 1(6) +6,012
Debt Service
Other funds Ch. 385 1(7) -11,342,539
Department of Revenue:
Administration
General Fund Ch. 361 1(1) -615,764
Other funds Ch. 361 2(1) -186,696
Property Tax Division
General Fund Ch. 361 1(2) -134,536
Other funds Ch. 361 2(2) -4,114
Personal Tax and
Compliance Division
General Fund Ch. 361 1(3) -173,625
Other funds Ch. 361 2(3) -4,565
Business Division
General Fund Ch. 361 1(4) -117,634
Other funds Ch. 361 2(4) -44,527
Collections Division
General Fund Ch. 361 1(5) -69,791
Other funds Ch. 361 2(5) -7,505
Information Technology
Services Division
General Fund Ch. 361 1(6) -190,043
Other funds Ch. 361 2(7) -33,295
Debt Service and Related
Costs
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 86
General Fund Ch. 361 1(7) -571,500
Corporate Division
Other funds Ch. 361 2(6) -93,199
Marijuana Program
Other funds Ch. 361 2(8) -12,696
Senior Property Tax
Deferral Program
Other funds Ch. 361 2(9) -11,523
Employment Relations
Board:
Operating Expenses
General Fund Ch. 79 1 -47,287
Assessments of Agencies
Other funds Ch. 79 3 -31,546
Office of the Governor:
Operating Expenses
General Fund Ch. 358 1 +287,101
Other funds Ch. 358 4 -18,931
Regional Solutions
Lottery funds Ch. 358 3 -30,723
Oregon Government Ethics
Commission:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 61 1 -34,122
State Library:
Operating Expenses
General Fund Ch. 384 1 -2,470
Operating Expenses
- Assessments
Other funds Ch. 384 3 -3,707
(2) CONSUMER AND BUSINESS SERVICES.
2023
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $ 
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Oregon Board of Accountancy:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 78 1 -70,954
State Board of Tax
Practitioners:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 64 1 -20,850
Construction Contractors
Board:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 353 1 -119,495
Mental Health Regulatory
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 87
Agency
Oregon Board of Licensed
Professional Counselors
and Therapists:
Other funds Ch. 359 1 -40,962
Oregon Board of
Psychology:
Other funds Ch. 359 2 -30,704
State Board of Chiropractic
Examiners:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 60 1 -34,247
State Board of Licensed
Social Workers:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 80 1 -24,782
Oregon Board of Dentistry:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 355 1 -26,936
Health-Related Licensing
Boards:
State Mortuary and
Cemetery Board
Other funds Ch. 62 1 -17,464
Oregon Board of
Naturopathic Medicine
Other funds Ch. 62 2 -7,935
Occupational Therapy
Licensing Board
Other funds Ch. 62 3 -4,425
Board of Medical Imaging
Other funds Ch. 62 4 -16,941
State Board of Examiners
for Speech-Language
Pathology and Audiology
Other funds Ch. 62 5 -8,911
Oregon State Veterinary
Medical Examining Board
Other funds Ch. 62 6 -12,230
Bureau of Labor and
Industries:
Operating Expenses
General Fund Ch. 471 1 -6,969
Other funds Ch. 471 2 +43,893
Federal funds Ch. 471 4 +8,023
Wage Security Fund
Administration
Other funds Ch. 471 3(1) -44,098
Public Utility Commission:
Utility Program
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 88
Other funds Ch. 483 1(1) -200,050
Residential Service
Protection Fund
Other funds Ch. 483 1(2) -9,911
Administration
Other funds Ch. 483 1(3) -192,659
Oregon Board of Maritime
Pilots
Other funds Ch. 483 1(4) -10,714
Department of Consumer
and Business Services:
Workers’ Compensation
Board
Other funds Ch. 354 1(1) -76,661
Workers’ Compensation
Division
Other funds Ch. 354 1(2) -351,564
Oregon OSHA
Other funds Ch. 354 1(3) -485,080
Central Services Division
Other funds Ch. 354 1(4) -380,581
Division of Financial
Regulation
Other funds Ch. 354 1(5) -398,262
Federal funds Ch. 354 2(4) -191
Building Codes Division
Other funds Ch. 354 1(6) -221,107
Real Estate Agency:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 387 1 -106,793
Oregon State Board of
Nursing:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 474 1 -108,458
Oregon Medical Board:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 94 1 -64,529
State Board of Pharmacy:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 479 1 -74,238
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(3) ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT.
_______________________________________________________________________________________
2023
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $ 
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 89
Oregon Business Development
Department:
Oregon Arts Commission
General Fund Ch. 475 1(1) -18,158
Business, Innovation and
Trade
Other funds Ch. 475 4(2) -27,052
Lottery funds Ch. 475 8(2) -79,287
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 475 1(2) -1,768,200
Infrastructure
Other funds Ch. 475 4(3) -84,612
Lottery funds Ch. 475 8(3) -27,520
Federal funds Ch. 475 9(3) -1,910
Operations
Other funds Ch. 475 4(1) -38,337
Lottery funds Ch. 475 8(1) -188,478
Arts and Cultural Trust
Other funds Ch. 475 4(4) -13,524
Lottery Bond Debt Service
Lottery funds Ch. 475 8(5) -1,630,664
Arts
Federal funds Ch. 475 9(4) -796
Housing and Community
Services Department:
Operating Expenses
General Fund Ch. 390 1 -5,193
Other funds Ch. 390 2 -516,830
Federal funds Ch. 390 4 -94,360
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 390 5 -15,398,550
Lottery funds Ch. 390 3 -381,340
Department of Veterans’
Affairs:
Services Provided by
the department
General Fund Ch. 485 1(1) -1,964
Veteran Loans, Oregon
Veterans’ Homes
Other funds Ch. 485 4(1) -410,335
Employment Department:
Unemployment Insurance,
Shared Services and
Workforce Operations,
Contributions and Recovery,
and Workforce and
Economic Research
Other funds Ch. 379 1(1) -1,214,960
Office of Administrative
Hearings
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 90
Other funds Ch. 379 1(2) -110,980
Family and Medical Leave
Insurance Program
Other funds Ch. 379 1(3) -256,472
Modernization Initiative
Other funds Ch. 379 1(4) -193,149
Operating Budget
Federal funds Ch. 379 4 -188,267
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(4) EDUCATION.
_______________________________________________________________________________________
2023
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $ 
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Teacher Standards and
Practices Commission:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 484 2 +135,100
Department of Education:
Operations
General Fund Ch. 449 1(1) -808,087
Other funds Ch. 449 6(2) -243,035
Federal funds Ch. 449 8(1) -15,377
Debt Service for General
Obligation Bonds
General Fund Ch. 449 4 -10,861,500
Debt Service for Lottery
Bonds
Lottery funds Ch. 449 5 -254,270
Statewide Education
Initiatives Account
Other funds Ch. 449 14 -39,900
Department of Early
Learning and Care:
Operations
General Fund Ch. 448 1(1) -158,360
Other funds Ch. 448 2(1) -22,639
Federal funds Ch. 448 3(1) -335,349
Operations transfer from
Early Learning Account
Other funds Ch. 448 4(1) -24,005
Higher Education
Coordinating Commission:
HECC programs, grants
and operations
General Fund Ch. 454 1(1) -253,597
Other funds Ch. 454 8(1) -103,417
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 91
Federal funds Ch. 454 11 -77,996
Debt Service
general obligation bonds
Community Colleges
General Fund Ch. 454
1(11)(b) -215,470
Debt Service
general obligation bonds
Public Universities
General Fund Ch. 454
1(11)(a) -2,589,620
Other funds Ch. 454 8(3) +3,860,789
Lottery Debt Service - From
Administrative Services
Economic Development Fund
for Public Universities
Lottery funds Ch. 454 2 -348,584
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(5) HUMAN SERVICES.
_______________________________________________________________________________________
2023
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $ 
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Long Term Care Ombudsman:
General Program and Services
Provided to Care Facility
Residents
General Fund Ch. 472 1(1) -8,483
Public Guardian and
Conservator Program
General Fund Ch. 472 1(2) -35,550
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 472 2 -431
Commission for the Blind:
Operating Expenses
General Fund Ch. 376 1 -4,489
Other funds Ch. 376 2 -1,466
Federal funds Ch. 376 3 -193,890
Psychiatric Security Review
Board:
Operating Expenses
General Fund Ch. 480 1 -144,327
Department of Human
Services:
State Assessments and
Enterprise-Wide Costs
General Fund Ch. 610 1(2) -45,747
Other funds Ch. 610 2(2) -8,010
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 92
Federal funds Ch. 610 3(2) -55,630
Self-Sufficiency Programs
General Fund Ch. 610 1(3) -37,482
Other funds Ch. 610 2(3) +45,842
Federal funds Ch. 610 3(3) -1,913,658
Vocational Rehabilitation
Services
General Fund Ch. 610 1(4) -249,097
Other funds Ch. 610 2(4) -226
Federal funds Ch. 610 3(4) -178,266
Child Welfare Programs
General Fund Ch. 610 1(5) -4,268
Other funds Ch. 610 2(5) -46
Federal funds Ch. 610 3(5) -12,176
Aging and People With
Disabilities Programs
General Fund Ch. 610 1(6) -3,638,074
Federal funds Ch. 610 3(6) -2,777,031
Intellectual/Developmental
Disabilities Programs
General Fund Ch. 610 1(7) -86,278
Other funds Ch. 610 2(7) -1,920
Federal funds Ch. 610 3(7) -75,334
Oregon Eligibility
Partnership
General Fund Ch. 610 1(8) -49,411
Other funds Ch. 610 2(9) -188,396
Federal funds Ch. 610 3(8) -70,854
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 610 1(9) -2,855,780
Shared Services
Other funds Ch. 610 2(8) -3
Oregon Health Authority:
Health Systems Division
Administration
General Fund Ch. 591 1(1) -108,825
Other funds Ch. 591 2(1) -23,630
Lottery funds Ch. 591 3(1) -118
Federal funds Ch. 591 5(1) -132,071
Health Policy and
Analytics
General Fund Ch. 591 1(3) -9,317
Other funds Ch. 591 2(3) -102,072
Federal funds Ch. 591 5(3) -9,389
Public Health
General Fund Ch. 591 1(4) -71,072
Other funds Ch. 591 2(5) -181,068
Federal funds Ch. 591 5(4) -35,201
Oregon State Hospital
General Fund Ch. 591 1(5) -127,523
Federal funds Ch. 591 5(5) -173
Central Services
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 93
General Fund Ch. 591 1(6) -57,668
Other funds Ch. 591 2(8) -4,348
Federal funds Ch. 591 5(6) -8,170
State Assessments and
Enterprise-Wide Costs
General Fund Ch. 591 1(7) -6,737,168
Other funds Ch. 591 2(9) -935,819
Federal funds Ch. 591 5(7) -1,740,455
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 591 1(9) -26,000
Lottery funds Ch. 591 3(6) -297,770
Shared Administrative
Services
Other funds Ch. 591 2(10) -8,195
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(6) JUDICIAL BRANCH.
_______________________________________________________________________________________
2023
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $ 
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Commission on Judicial
Fitness and Disability:
Administration
General Fund Ch. 381 1 +469
Judicial Department:
Operations
General Fund Ch. 380 1(2) -718,094
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 380 1(5) +11,735,830
Public Defense Services
Commission:
Administrative Services
Division
General Fund Ch. 481 1(9) -38,320
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(7) LEGISLATIVE BRANCH.
_______________________________________________________________________________________
2023
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $ 
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Legislative Administration
Committee:
General Program
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 94
General Fund Ch. 383 1(1) -138,597
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 383 1(2) -262,710
Legislative Assembly:
Biennial General Fund
General Fund Ch. 383 6 -35,197
Legislative Counsel
Committee:
General Program
General Fund Ch. 383 11 -11,341
Legislative Fiscal
Officer:
Operating Expenses
General Fund Ch. 383 14(1) -1,644
Legislative Policy and
Research Committee:
Operating Expenses
General Fund Ch. 383 15 -31,806
Legislative Revenue
Officer:
Operating Expenses
General Fund Ch. 383 16 -123
Commission on Indian
Services:
Operating Expenses
General Fund Ch. 383 17 -27,755
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(8) NATURAL RESOURCES.
_______________________________________________________________________________________
2023
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $ 
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
State Marine Board:
Administration and
Education
Other funds Ch. 473 1(1) -51,334
State Department of
Energy:
Operations
Other funds Ch. 451 2 -187,032
Federal funds Ch. 451 4 -682
State Department of
Geology and Mineral
Industries:
Geologic Survey
General Fund Ch. 470 1(1) -152,404
Other funds Ch. 470 2(1) -8,674
State Parks and Recreation
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 95
Department:
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 477 1 -479,980
Lottery funds Ch. 477 4 -176,730
Director’s Office
Other funds Ch. 477 2(1) -194,559
Lottery funds Ch. 477 3(1) -200,698
Central Services
Other funds Ch. 477 2(2) -6,446
Land Use Board of Appeals:
General Fund Ch. 456 1 +3,166
Water Resources
Department:
Administrative Services
General Fund Ch. 460 1(1) -128,974
Other funds Ch. 460 3(1) -1,411
Field Services
General Fund Ch. 460 1(2) -70,382
Other funds Ch. 460 3(2) -22,459
Water Rights and
Adjudications
General Fund Ch. 460 1(3) -1,898
Other funds Ch. 460 3(3) -13,701
Technical Services
General Fund Ch. 460 1(4) -15,302
Other funds Ch. 460 3(4) -8,659
Director’s Office
General Fund Ch. 460 1(5) -135,491
Other funds Ch. 460 3(5) -2,284
Debt Service
Lottery funds Ch. 460 2 -1,848,850
Oregon Watershed
Enhancement Board:
Operations
Lottery funds Ch. 603 6 -37,082
Federal funds Ch. 603 8(1) -2,010
Department of State Lands:
Common School Fund
Programs
Other funds Ch. 459 1(1) -1,033,674
South Slough National
Estuarine Research
Reserve Operations
Other funds Ch. 459 1(2) -551
State Department of
Agriculture:
Administrative and
Support Services
General Fund Ch. 350 1(1) -7,939
Other funds Ch. 350 2(1) -24,486
Food Safety
General Fund Ch. 350 1(2) -146,393
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 96
Other funds Ch. 350 2(2) -76,444
Federal funds Ch. 350 4(2) -3,657
Natural Resources
General Fund Ch. 350 1(3) -100,899
Other funds Ch. 350 2(3) -85,074
Federal funds Ch. 350 4(3) -7,759
Market Access
General Fund Ch. 350 1(4) -70,353
Other funds Ch. 350 2(4) -57,357
Federal funds Ch. 350 4(4) -12,500
Parks and Natural
Resources Fund
Lottery funds Ch. 350 3 -25,662
Department of
Environmental Quality:
Air Quality
General Fund Ch. 452 1(1) -52,871
Other funds Ch. 452 2(1) -45,159
Federal funds Ch. 452 5(1) -29,250
Water Quality
General Fund Ch. 452 1(2) -30,939
Other funds Ch. 452 2(2) -45,630
Lottery funds Ch. 452 3 -15,876
Federal funds Ch. 452 5(2) -4,051
Land Quality
Other funds Ch. 452 2(3) -95,880
Federal funds Ch. 452 5(3) -4,485
Agency Management
General Fund Ch. 452 1(4) -106,032
Other funds Ch. 452 2(4) -1,075,511
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 452 1(5) -54,000
State Department of
Fish and Wildlife:
Fish Division
Other funds Ch. 590 2(1) -61,045
Lottery funds Ch. 590 3(1) -36
Federal funds Ch. 590 4(1) -147
Wildlife Division
General Fund Ch. 590 1(2) -438
Other funds Ch. 590 2(2) -31,224
Lottery funds Ch. 590 3(2) -71
Federal funds Ch. 590 4(2) -2,126
Administrative Services
Division
General Fund Ch. 590 1(3) +269,384
Other funds Ch. 590 2(3) +275,693
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 590 1(4) -382,000
Other funds Ch. 590 2(5) +397,000
Habitat Division
General Fund Ch. 590 1(7) -88
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 97
Other funds Ch. 590 2(7) -184
Federal funds Ch. 590 4(5) -156
State Forestry Department:
Agency Administration
Other funds Ch. 453 2(1) +2,626,169
Federal funds Ch. 453 4(1) -1
Fire Protection
General Fund Ch. 453 1(1) -887
Other funds Ch. 453 2(2) -4,060
Federal funds Ch. 453 4(2) -32,311
Forest Resources
General Fund Ch. 453 1(2) -8,670
Other funds Ch. 453 2(4) -3,493
Federal funds Ch. 453 4(4) -1,336
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 453 1(4) -475,849
Other funds Ch. 453 2(7) -1,023,723
State Forests
Other funds Ch. 453 2(3) -20,040
Planning Branch
Other funds Ch. 453 2(5) -2,237
Federal funds Ch. 453 4(5) -1
Equipment Pool
Other funds Ch. 453 2(8) -2,414
Facilities Maintenance
and Management
Other funds Ch. 453 2(9) -68
Department of Land
Conservation and
Development:
Planning Program
General Fund Ch. 455 1(1) -83,697
Other funds Ch. 455 2 -4,883
Federal funds Ch. 455 3 -27,346
Columbia River Gorge
Commission:
General Fund Ch. 352 1 -2,316
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(9) PUBLIC SAFETY.
_______________________________________________________________________________________
2023
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $ 
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
State Board of Parole and
Post-Prison Supervision:
General Fund Ch. 478 1 -123,987
Department of State Police:
Patrol Services, Criminal
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 98
Investigations and Gaming
Enforcement
General Fund Ch. 386 1(1) -515,411
Other funds Ch. 386 2(1) -14,457
Federal funds Ch. 386 3(1) +3,354
Fish and Wildlife
Enforcement
General Fund Ch. 386 1(2) -60,650
Other funds Ch. 386 2(2) -12,740
Lottery funds Ch. 386 4 -4,669
Federal funds Ch. 386 3(2) +668
Forensic Services and
Chief Medical Examiner
General Fund Ch. 386 1(3) -111,321
Other funds Ch. 386 2(3) +36
Federal funds Ch. 386 3(3) +122
Administrative Services,
Agency Support and
Criminal Justice
Information Services
General Fund Ch. 386 1(4) -309,387
Other funds Ch. 386 2(4) -81,792
Federal funds Ch. 386 3(4) +2,409
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 386 1(5) -1,205,270
Department of Corrections:
Central Administration
and Administrative Services
General Fund Ch. 377 1(2) +4,799,062
Other funds Ch. 377 2(2) -28
Operations and Health
Services
Other funds Ch. 377 2(1) -1,233,456
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 377 1(5) -1,399,249
Oregon Criminal Justice
Commission:
General Fund Ch. 378 1 -54,539
Other funds Ch. 378 3 -26,948
Federal funds Ch. 378 4 -7,593
District Attorneys
and Deputies:
Department of Justice
for District Attorneys
General Fund Ch. 356 1 +116,385
Department of Justice:
Office of the Attorney
General and Administration
General Fund Ch. 382 1(1) -34,562
Other funds Ch. 382 2(1) -103,368
Appellate Division
General Fund Ch. 382 1(2) -3,440
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 99
Other funds Ch. 382 2(2) -34,661
Criminal Justice Division
General Fund Ch. 382 1(3) -7,917
Other funds Ch. 382 2(5) -63,587
Federal funds Ch. 382 3(2) -671
Crime Victim and Survivor
Services Division
General Fund Ch. 382 1(4) -2,735,992
Other funds Ch. 382 2(6) -51,924
Federal funds Ch. 382 3(3) -16,658
Defense of Criminal
Convictions
General Fund Ch. 382 1(5) -137,026
Division of Child Support
General Fund Ch. 382 1(6) -42,363
Other funds Ch. 382 2(9) -99,437
Federal funds Ch. 382 3(4) -492,101
Civil Enforcement Division
Other funds Ch. 382 2(3) -617,364
Federal funds Ch. 382 3(1) -13,755
Child Advocacy Division
Other funds Ch. 382 2(4) -46,875
General Counsel Division
Other funds Ch. 382 2(7) -47,075
Trial Division
Other funds Ch. 382 2(8) -117,228
Oregon Military
Department:
Administration
General Fund Ch. 360 1(1) +53,241
Other funds Ch. 360 2(1) -15,796
Operations
General Fund Ch. 360 1(2) -17,190
Other funds Ch. 360 2(2) -7,913
Federal funds Ch. 360 3(1) -100,118
Community Support
General Fund Ch. 360 1(3) -82,772
Other funds Ch. 360 2(3) -11,618
Federal funds Ch. 360 3(2) -39,102
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 360 1(4) -880,210
Department of Emergency
Management:
Administration
General Fund Ch. 357 1(1) +1,405,312
Other funds Ch. 357 2(1) -180
Preparedness and Response
General Fund Ch. 357 1(2) -1
Federal funds Ch. 357 3(2) -17
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 357 1(4) -299,560
9-1-1 Emergency Program
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 100
Other funds Ch. 357 2(2) +279,561
Mitigation and Recovery
Federal funds Ch. 357 3(3) -136
Department of Public
Safety Standards and
Training:
Operations
Other funds Ch. 482 2(1) -308,721
Federal funds Ch. 482 3 -1,347
Public Safety Memorial
Fund
Other funds Ch. 482 2(2) +5,646
Oregon Youth Authority:
Facility Programs
General Fund Ch. 487 1(1) -114,591
Community Programs
General Fund Ch. 487 1(2) -166,261
Federal funds Ch. 487 3(1) -28,219
Program Support
General Fund Ch. 487 1(3) -1,231,862
Federal funds Ch. 487 3(2) -40,380
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 487 1(6) -3,120,677
Department of the State
Fire Marshal:
Other funds Ch. 224 2 -2,286,453
Federal funds Ch. 224 3 -106
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(10) TRANSPORTATION.
_______________________________________________________________________________________
2023
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $ 
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Oregon Department of
Aviation:
Operations
Other funds Ch. 362 2(1) -9,938
Department of
Transportation:
Maintenance
Other funds Ch. 363 2(2) +1,480,244
Project Delivery and
Support
Other funds Ch. 363 2(3) -90,513
Local Government Program
Other funds Ch. 363 2(4) -982
Driver and Motor Vehicle
Services
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 101
Other funds Ch. 363 2(5) -184,961
Federal funds Ch. 363 3(1) -1,762
Commerce and Compliance
Other funds Ch. 363 2(7) -19,656
Policy, Data and Analysis
Other funds Ch. 363 2(8) -17,946
Public Transportation
Other funds Ch. 363 2(9) -67,102
Federal funds Ch. 363 3(4) -88,712
Administrative Services
Other funds Ch. 363 2(10) -3,333,524
Finance and Budget
Other funds Ch. 363 2(11) -976,575
Debt Service
Lottery funds Ch. 363 4 -76,660
_______________________________________________________________________________________
SECTION 527. The section captions used in this 2024 Act are provided only for the con-
venience of the reader and do not become part  of the statutory law of this state or express
any legislative intent in the enactment of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 528. This 2024 Act being necessary for  the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate March 7, 2024
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House March 7, 2024
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 102